Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3988.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 TRANSPORTATION FINANCE Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 1, section 17, subdivision 17, is amended to read: Subd. 17. Progress Parkway; Eveleth. $6,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for one or more grants to St. Louis County for predesign, design, engineering, environmental analysis and mitigation, land acquisition, construction, and reconstruction of Progress Parkway to provide for intersection improvements and road realignment and extension from marked U.S. Highway 53 and St. Louis County State-Aid Highway 142 to marked Trunk Highway 37 and Station 44 Road in the city of Eveleth. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2027deleted text end new text begin 2030new text end . Sec. 2. Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 1, section 2, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Agency Management (a) Agency Services -0- 243,000 This appropriation is from the general fund for costs related to complete streets implementation training under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.75, subdivision 2a. (b) Buildings -0- 32,650,000 $20,100,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for the transportation facilities capital improvement program under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.595. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. $7,750,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for land acquisition, predesign, design, and construction of expanded truck parking at Big Spunk in Avon and Enfield Rest Areas and for the rehabilitation or replacement of truck parking information management system equipment at Department of Transportation-owned parking rest area locations. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. $4,800,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for predesign, design, engineering, environmental analysis and remediation, acquisition of land or permanent easements, and construction of one or more truck parking safety projects for the trunk highway system. Each truck parking safety project must expand truck parking availability in proximity to a trunk highway and be located in the Department of Transportation metropolitan district. In developing each project, the commissioner must seek partnerships with local units of government, established truck stop businesses, or a combination. Partnership activities may include but are not limited to parking site identification and review, financial assistance, donation of land, and project development activities. new text begin This appropriation is available for the truck parking improvement program under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.68, for trunk highway projects that are located in the Department of Transportation metropolitan district. new text end This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2027deleted text end new text begin 2029new text end . Sec. 3. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Multimodal Systems (a) Aeronautics (1) Airport Development and Assistance 27,398,000 27,248,000 This appropriation is from the state airports fund and must be spent according to Minnesota Statutes, section 360.305, subdivision 4. $5,000,000 in each year is for a grant to the Duluth Airport Authority to design, construct, furnish, and equip a new air traffic control tower base building at the Duluth International Airport, including associated site preparation, building demolition, and utility and stormwater retention system improvements. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner must not use any amount of this appropriation for administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for a grant to the city of McGregor to relocate the automated weather station at the McGregor Isedor Iverson Airport. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner must not use any amount of this appropriation for administrative costs. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, subdivision 6, this appropriation is available for five years after the year of the appropriation. If the appropriation for either year is insufficient, the appropriation for the other year is available for it. If the commissioner of transportation determines that a balance remains in the state airports fund following the appropriations made in this article and that the appropriations made are insufficient for advancing airport development and assistance projects, an amount necessary to advance the projects, not to exceed the balance in the state airports fund, is appropriated in each year to the commissioner and must be spent according to Minnesota Statutes, section 360.305, subdivision 4. Within two weeks of a determination under this contingent appropriation, the commissioner of transportation must notify the commissioner of management and budget and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation finance concerning the funds appropriated. Funds appropriated under this contingent appropriation do not adjust the base for fiscal years 2028 and 2029. The base is $22,248,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. (2) Aviation Support Services 9,583,000 9,733,000 Appropriations by Fund 2026 2027 General 1,843,000 1,993,000 Airports 7,740,000 7,740,000 The base from the state airports fund is $7,790,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. (3) Civil Air Patrol 180,000 180,000 This appropriation is from the state airports fund for the Civil Air Patrol. (b) Transit and Active Transportation 7,421,000 7,376,000 This appropriation is from the general fund. $45,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for a grant to the city of Chatfield for the next phase of development of a transportation management organization in southeastern Minnesota. This appropriation is for: (1) the development of organizational structure, including staffing, an oversight committee, and responsibilities of the host organization; and (2) community outreach and education. Up to $1,000 of the appropriation is for related administrative costs for the city of Chatfield. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner must not use any amount of this appropriation for administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. The base is $18,376,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. (c) Safe Routes to School 1,500,000 1,500,000 This appropriation is from the general fund for the safe routes to school program under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.40. If the appropriation for either year is insufficient, the appropriation for the other year is available for it. (d) Passenger Rail 5,743,000 deleted text begin 5,743,000 deleted text end new text begin 5,493,000 new text end This appropriation is from the general fund for passenger rail activities under Minnesota Statutes, sections 174.632 to 174.636.new text begin The base for this appropriation is $5,743,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029.new text end (e) Freight 9,115,000 9,184,000 Appropriations by Fund 2026 2027 General 2,303,000 2,303,000 Trunk Highway 6,812,000 6,881,000 $900,000 in each year is from the general fund for staff, operating costs, and maintenance related to weight and safety enforcement systems. Sec. 4. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 4, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. State Patrol (a) Patrolling Highways 147,013,000 148,960,000 Appropriations by Fund 2026 2027 General 37,000 37,000 H.U.T.D. 92,000 92,000 Trunk Highway 146,884,000 148,831,000 $1,045,000 in each year is from the trunk highway fund for recruitment and hiring initiatives. Of the base from the trunk highway fund, $10,365,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029 is for this purpose, which includes funding to conduct an additional annual trooper academy. The base from the trunk highway fund is $158,151,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. (b) Commercial Vehicle Enforcement 18,861,000 18,861,000 (c) Capitol Security deleted text begin 19,243,000 deleted text end new text begin 23,968,000 new text end deleted text begin 19,243,000 deleted text end new text begin 39,427,000 new text end This appropriation is from the general fund. new text begin $210,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $10,624,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for security enhancements on the Capitol complex, including but not limited to equipment, staffing, and operations. The base for this purpose is $2,709,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. new text end new text begin $2,595,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $9,560,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for screening of individuals entering the State Capitol building. Of the amount in fiscal year 2027, $2,433,000 is available until June 30, 2030. The base for this purpose is $7,775,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $5,684,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin The base for the appropriation under this paragraph is $29,727,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $27,636,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end The commissioner must not: (1) spend any money from the trunk highway fund for capitol security; or (2) permanently transfer any state trooper from the patrolling highways activity to capitol security. The commissioner must not transfer any money appropriated to the commissioner under this section: (1) to capitol security; or (2) from capitol security. (d) Vehicle Crimes Unit 1,290,000 1,303,000 This appropriation is from the highway user tax distribution fund to investigate: (1) registration tax and motor vehicle sales tax liabilities from individuals and businesses that currently do not pay all taxes owed; and (2) illegal or improper activity related to the sale, transfer, titling, and registration of motor vehicles. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 4, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Driver and Vehicle Services (a) Driver Services 47,665,000 deleted text begin 47,132,000 deleted text end new text begin 47,259,000 new text end This appropriation is from the driver and vehicle services operating account under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.705. $317,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for rulemaking costs for the ignition interlock device program under Minnesota Statutes, section 171.306. $218,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for costs of adding work zone safety information into the driver's manual and written examination and related rulemaking. new text begin $141,000 in fiscal year 2027 is for costs of including an optional speech condition identifier on drivers' licenses and Minnesota identification cards. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin $138,000 in fiscal year 2027 is for rulemaking costs related to requiring persons under 21 years of age to complete a driver education course before obtaining a driver's license. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin $3,000 in fiscal year 2027 is for updates to the driver's manual related to driver education age requirements. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $46,977,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. new text end (b) Vehicle Services deleted text begin 32,179,000 deleted text end new text begin 32,101,000 new text end deleted text begin 32,179,000 deleted text end new text begin 32,101,000 new text end This appropriation is from the driver and vehicle services operating account under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.705. $2,500,000 in each year is for payments to deputy registrars under Minnesota Statutes, section 168.33, subdivision 7a, and to driver's license agents under Minnesota Statutes, section 171.061, subdivision 4a. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 8, is amended to read: Sec. 8. APPROPRIATION; UNIVERSITY OF MINNESOTA. $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the empowering small Minnesota communities program under Minnesota Statutes, section 137.345. deleted text begin This is a onetime appropriationdeleted text end new text begin These are onetime appropriations and are available until June 30, 2028new text end . Sec. 7. new text begin ALLOCATION; METROPOLITAN COUNCIL; I-494 CORRIDOR COMMISSION.new text end new text begin Of the money allocated to the Metropolitan Council under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.4465, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (2), the Metropolitan Council must provide a grant of $300,000 in fiscal year 2027 to the I-494 Corridor Commission. This section applies notwithstanding provisions on the use of funds under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.4465, subdivision 2. Grant funds under this section are available for programming and service expansion to assist companies and commuters with carpool, vanpool, bicycle commuting, telework, and transit. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ATTORNEY GENERAL.new text end new text begin $142,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the attorney general to enforce the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 169.981. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DEPARTMENT OF EMPLOYMENT AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for the driver's education financial assistance pilot program established in article 2, section 70. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY.new text end new text begin (a) $119,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the active transportation account in the special revenue fund to the commissioner of public safety for the costs of the motorized bicycle safety coordinator under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.2231. The base for this appropriation is $121,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. new text end new text begin (b) $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the active transportation account in the special revenue fund to the commissioner of public safety for the public education campaign on electric-assisted and motorized bicycle safety under article 2, section 71. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (c) $10,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the driver and vehicle services operating account in the special revenue fund to the commissioner of public safety for a media campaign relating to the requirement for persons under 21 years of age to complete a driver education course before obtaining a driver's license. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION; PASSENGER RAIL.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for the following: new text end new text begin (1) intercity passenger rail projects in the Phase I corridors level identified in the 2015 update to the state rail plan under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.03, subdivision 1b; new text end new text begin (2) providing state matching funds for obtaining federal grants to complete the Step 2 service development plan under the Federal Railroad Administration's Corridor Identification and Development Program; new text end new text begin (3) planning, development, and staffing costs for the required application in subdivision 2, paragraph (a), and completion of the Step 1 scoping requirements under subdivision 2, paragraph (b); and new text end new text begin (4) grants to political subdivisions for planning and service development activities consistent with the passenger rail implementation and policy established in the state rail plan under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.03, subdivision 1b, including: new text end new text begin (i) project cost estimates; new text end new text begin (ii) alternatives analysis; new text end new text begin (iii) preliminary engineering; new text end new text begin (iv) environmental analysis; new text end new text begin (v) benefit cost; or new text end new text begin (vi) economic impact analysis. new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. The appropriation is only available for the Minnesota share of project costs. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Corridors; identification and development required. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of transportation must apply to the Federal Railroad Administration's Corridor Identification and Development Program established by the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act under United States Code, title 49, section 25101(a), or a successor program, for planning and development of two intercity passenger rail corridors with service originating in and extending beyond Minnesota. The two routes include: new text end new text begin (1) passenger rail service from St. Paul to Fargo, North Dakota; and new text end new text begin (2) establishment of new passenger rail service from St. Paul to Kansas City, Missouri. new text end new text begin (b) Upon successful application and award of development funds from the Federal Railroad Administration for the routes developed in paragraph (a), the commissioner must execute and complete all Step 1 scoping requirements under the Corridor Identification and Development Program for both routes in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SOUTHEAST MINNESOTA TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT ORGANIZATION.new text end new text begin (a) $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to Southeast Service Cooperative for development and implementation of a transportation management organization that provides services in the counties of Dodge, Fillmore, Freeborn, Goodhue, Houston, Mower, Olmsted, Rice, Steele, Wabasha, and Winona. This appropriation is available for implementation costs, planning, and services related to transit and other forms of transportation. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner must not use any amount of this appropriation for administrative costs. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin TRANSFER.new text end new text begin $550,000 in fiscal year 2027 is transferred from the aircraft capital account under Minnesota Statutes, section 360.024, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), to the air transportation services account under Minnesota Statutes, section 360.024, subdivision 2, paragraph (a). This is a onetime transfer. new text end ARTICLE 2 TRANSPORTATION FINANCE AND POLICY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 111. new text end new text begin Officer / Firefighter Gary L. Schroeder, Jr. Memorial Highway. new text end new text begin That segment of marked Trunk Highway 58 within the city of Zumbrota is designated as "Officer / Firefighter Gary L. Schroeder, Jr. Memorial Highway." Subject to section 161.139, the commissioner must adopt a suitable design to mark this highway and erect appropriate signs. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.46, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Relocation of facilities; reimbursement. new text begin (a)new text end Whenever the commissioner determines that the relocation of any utility facility is necessitated by the construction of a project on the routes of federally aided trunk highways, including urban extensions thereof, that are included within the National System of Interstate Highways, the owner or operator of the utility facility must relocate the utility facility in accordance with the order of the commissioner. Except as provided in section 161.45, subdivision 6, paragraph (d), or 7, upon the completion of relocation of a utility facility, the cost of relocation must be ascertained and paid out of the trunk highway fund by the commissioner, provided the amount paid by the commissioner for reimbursement to a utility does not exceed the amount on which the federal government bases its reimbursement for the interstate highway system. new text begin (b) When a local unit of government, as defined in section 18B.01, subdivision 14a, or Minnesota Tribal government, as defined in section 10.65, subdivision 2, owns a utility system for supplying light, water, sanitary sewer service, or storm sewer service and the system is authorized by law to use a public highway for the location of the utility facility, the remaining service life of the utility must be determined by the commissioner and must be paid out of the trunk highway fund whenever the commissioner determines that a relocation of the system is required by the construction of a project on the trunk highway system. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 165.01, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Bridge. "Bridge" is defined as a structure, including supports erected over a depression or an obstruction, such as water, a highway, or a railway, having a track or passageway for carrying traffic or other moving loads, and having an opening measured horizontally along the center of the roadway of ten feet or more between undercopings of abutments, between the spring line of arches, or between the extreme ends of openings for multiple boxes. Bridge also includes multiple pipes where the clear distance between openings is less than one-half of the smaller contiguous opening. This definition of a bridge includes deleted text begin only those railroad and pedestrian bridges overdeleted text end new text begin structures carrying vehicular traffic onnew text end a public highway or street.new text begin Structures carrying railroad, all-terrain vehicle, snowmobile, or pedestrian traffic are included in this definition only if the structures cross over a public highway or street.new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 165.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Bridge and Structure Inspection Program Manual (BSIPM). new text end new text begin "BSIPM" means the Bridge and Structure Inspection Program Manual developed by the Department of Transportation Bridge Office to outline inspection and inventory procedures for bridges and tunnels in Minnesota. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 165.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin National Tunnel Inspection Standards (NTIS). new text end new text begin "NTIS" means standards established by the Federal Highway Administration in Code of Federal Regulations, title 23, part 650, subpart E, incorporated here by reference. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 165.03, is amended to read: 165.03 deleted text begin STRENGTH OF BRIDGE;deleted text end INSPECTIONnew text begin AND LOAD RATINGnew text end . deleted text begin Subdivision 1. deleted text end deleted text begin Standards generally. deleted text end deleted text begin Each bridge, including a privately owned bridge, must conform to the strength, width, clearance, and safety standards imposed by the commissioner for the connecting highway or street. This subdivision applies to a bridge that is constructed after August 1, 1989, on any public highway or street. The bridge must have sufficient strength to support with safety the maximum vehicle weights allowed under sections 169.822 to 169.829 and must have the minimum width specified in section 165.04, subdivision 3. deleted text end Subd. 1a. Inspection. deleted text begin (a) Each bridge must be inspected annually, unless a longer interval not to exceed 24 months for bridges or 48 months for bridges classified as culverts is authorized by the commissioner. The commissioner's authorization must be based on factors including, but not limited to, the age and condition of the bridge, the rate of deterioration of the bridge, the type of structure, the susceptibility of the bridge to failure, and the characteristics of traffic on the bridge. The commissioner may require interim inspections at intervals of less than one year on bridges that are posted, bridges subjected to extreme scour conditions, bridges subject to significant substructure movement or settlement, and for other reasons as specified or inferred in the AASHTO manual. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) Additional requirements apply to structures meeting the NBIS definition of a bridge: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) Underwater structural elements must be inspected at regular intervals not to exceed 60 months. The commissioner may require inspections at intervals of less than 60 months on certain underwater structural elements based on factors including, but not limited to, construction material, environment, age, scour characteristics, the condition ratings from past inspections, and any known deficiencies. deleted text end deleted text begin (2) Fracture critical members, or FCMs, must receive a hands-on fracture critical inspection at intervals not to exceed 24 months. The commissioner may require inspections at intervals of less than 24 months on certain FCMs based on factors including, but not limited to, age, traffic characteristics, and any known deficiencies. deleted text end deleted text begin (3) The commissioner may establish criteria to determine the level and frequency of these inspections. If warranted by special circumstances, the commissioner retains the authority to determine the inspection type and required inspection frequency for any bridge on the state inventory. deleted text end new text begin (a) Each bridge meeting the definition of a bridge in section 650.305 of the National Bridge Inspection Standards (NBIS) must be inspected at intervals based on the requirements in section 650.311 of the NBIS. The commissioner may require inspections at intervals less than those required by the NBIS based on factors including but not limited to the age and condition of the bridge, the rate of deterioration of the bridge, the type of structure, the susceptibility of the bridge to failure, and the characteristics of traffic on the bridge. new text end new text begin (b) Each bridge meeting the definition of a bridge under section 165.01, subdivision 3, but not meeting the definition of a bridge in section 650.305 of the NBIS must be inspected at intervals determined by the commissioner based on factors including but not limited to the age and condition of the bridge, the rate of deterioration of the bridge, the type of structure, the susceptibility of the bridge to failure, and the characteristics of traffic on the bridge. new text end new text begin (c) The interval tolerances outlined in section 650.311, paragraph (e), of the NBIS apply to all bridge inspection types. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The thoroughness of each inspection depends on deleted text begin suchdeleted text end factors deleted text begin asdeleted text end new text begin includingnew text end age, traffic characteristics, state of maintenance, and known deficiencies. The evaluation of these factors is the responsibility of the engineer assigned the responsibility for inspection as defined by the commissioner deleted text begin of transportationdeleted text end . new text begin (e) For railroad, all-terrain vehicle, snowmobile, or pedestrian bridges, only those spans passing over a public highway or street are required to be inspected. new text end Subd. 2. Inspection and inventory responsibilities; rules; forms. (a) The commissioner deleted text begin of transportation willdeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end adopt the National Bridge Inspection Standards (NBIS) established by the Federal Highway Administration in Code of Federal Regulations, title 23, part 650, subpart C, or its successor documents, for structures meeting the NBIS definition of a bridge. The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end establish inspection and inventory standards for structures defined as bridges by section 165.01, subdivision 3. (b) The commissioner deleted text begin of transportation shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end adopt official inventory and bridge inspection report forms for use in making bridge inspections by the owners or highway authorities specified by this subdivision. Inspections must be made at regular intervals, not to exceed the intervals outlined in subdivision 1a, by the following owner or official: (1) the commissioner deleted text begin of transportationdeleted text end for all bridges located wholly or partially within or over the right-of-way of a state trunk highway; (2) the county highway engineer for all bridges located wholly or partially within or over the right-of-way of any county or town road, or any street within a municipality that does not have a city engineer regularly employed; (3) the city engineer for all bridges located wholly or partially within or over the right-of-way of any street located within or along municipal limits; (4) the commissioner deleted text begin of transportationdeleted text end in case of a toll bridge that is used by the general public and that is not inspected and certified under subdivision 6deleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin ,new text end provideddeleted text begin ,deleted text end that the commissioner deleted text begin of transportationdeleted text end may assess the owner for the costs of the inspection; (5) the owner of a bridge over a public highway or street or that carries a roadway designated for public use by a public authoritydeleted text begin ,deleted text end if not required to be inventoried and inspected under clause (1), (2), (3), or (4)deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (6) the owner of a private vehicular bridge that is open to the public and is immediately connected to a public road on both ends of the bridge, as described in section 650.303 of the NBIS; and new text end new text begin (7) the agency operating the rail transit system for any rail transit bridge crossing over a public highway or street, regardless of the bridge location in the right-of-way. new text end (c) The commissioner deleted text begin of transportation shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end prescribe the inspection and inventory procedures required to administer the bridge inspection program in Minnesota and has the authority to establish and publish standards that describe the inspection and inventory requirements to ensure compliance with paragraph (a). The owner or highway authority deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end inspect and inventory in accordance with these standards and furnish the commissioner with deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end data deleted text begin as may bedeleted text end necessary to maintain a central inventory. Subd. 3. County inventory and inspection records and reports. The county engineer deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end maintain a complete inventory record of all bridges as set forth in subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (2), deleted text begin withdeleted text end new text begin includingnew text end the inspection reports deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end , and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end certify annually to the commissioner, as prescribed by the commissioner, that inspections have been made at regular intervals, not to exceed the intervals outlined in subdivision 1a. A report of the inspections must be filed annuallydeleted text begin , on or before February 15 of each year,deleted text end with the county auditor or town clerkdeleted text begin ,deleted text end or the governing body of the municipality. The report must identify any deficiency requiring action, including the legal posting of load limits or the need to have a load rating analysis performed, on any bridge or structure that is found to be understrength or unsafe. The report may also contain other recommendations for improving the safety of understrength or unsafe bridges. Subd. 4. Municipal inventory and inspection records and reports. The city engineer deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end maintain a complete inventory record of all bridges as set forth in subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (3), deleted text begin withdeleted text end new text begin includingnew text end the inspection reports deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end , and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end certify annually to the commissioner, as prescribed by the commissioner, that inspections have been made at regular intervals, not to exceed the intervals outlined in subdivision 1a. A report of the inspections must be filed annuallydeleted text begin , on or before February 15 of each year,deleted text end with the governing body of the municipality. The report must contain recommendations for the correction of or legal posting of load limits on any bridge or structure that is found to be understrength or unsafe. Subd. 5. Agreement. Agreements may be made among the various units of governmentsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end or between governmental units and qualified engineering personnel to carry out the responsibilities for the bridge inspections and reportsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end as established by subdivision 2. Subd. 6. Other bridges. The owner of a toll bridge and the owner of a bridge described in subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (5), deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end certify to the commissioner, as prescribed by the commissioner, that inspections of the bridge or culvert have been made at regular intervals, not to exceed the intervals outlined in subdivision 1a. The certification must be accompanied by a report of the inspection. The report must contain recommendations for the correction of or legal posting of load limitations if the bridge is found to be understrength or unsafe. Subd. 6a. Bridge load rating and posting. (a) The term "posting" means the placement of regulatory signs at a bridge indicating the safe load carrying capacity of the bridge. (b) Each structure required to be inspected under subdivision 2, paragraph (a),new text begin that carries roadway vehicular trafficnew text end must be load rated to determine its safe load carrying capacity, and this rating must be reported on a structure inventory sheet form provided by the commissioner deleted text begin of transportationdeleted text end . A structure must be rerated when it is determined that a significant change has occurred in the condition of the structure or due to additional dead load placed on the structure since the last load rating. Load ratings must be reviewed and the structure rerated if necessary when the allowable legal load using the structure is increased. Changes in the load rating of a bridge must be indicated on the structure inventory sheet form. (c) If it is determined that the maximum legal load under state law exceeds the load permitted on the structure under the operating rating stress level assigned, the bridge must be posted. Posting signs adopted by the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be used for the posting. The owner or highway authority deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end post the bridge in accordance with the posted load assigned by the commissioner. Subd. 7. Department of Natural Resources bridge. (a) Notwithstanding subdivision 2, the commissioners of transportation and natural resources deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end negotiate a memorandum of understanding that governs the inspection of bridges owned, operated, or maintained by the commissioner of natural resources. (b) The memorandum of understanding must provide for: (1) the inspection and inventory of bridges subject to federal law or regulations; (2) the frequency of inspection of bridges described in subdivision 1a; and (3) who may perform inspections required under the memorandum of understanding. deleted text begin Subd. 8. deleted text end deleted text begin Biennial report on bridge inspection quality assurance. deleted text end deleted text begin By February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the commissioner shall submit a report electronically to the members of the senate and house of representatives committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance concerning quality assurance for bridge inspections. At a minimum, the report must: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) summarize the bridge inspection quality assurance and quality control procedures used in Minnesota; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) identify any substantive changes to quality assurance and quality control procedures made in the previous two years; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) summarize and provide a briefing on findings from bridge inspection quality reviews performed in the previous two years; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) identify actions taken and planned in response to findings from bridge inspection quality reviews performed in the previous two years; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) summarize the results of any bridge inspection compliance review by the Federal Highway Administration; and deleted text end deleted text begin (6) identify actions in response to the Federal Highway Administration compliance review taken by the department in order to reach full compliance. deleted text end Sec. 7. new text begin [165.16] BRIDGE STRENGTH. new text end new text begin Each bridge, including a privately owned bridge, must conform to the strength, width, clearance, and safety standards imposed by the commissioner for the connecting highway or street. Any bridge on a public highway or street constructed after August 1, 1989, must have sufficient strength to support with safety the maximum vehicle weights allowed under sections 169.822 to 169.829 and must have the minimum width specified in section 165.04, subdivision 3. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [165.17] TUNNEL INSPECTIONS. new text end new text begin Each tunnel meeting the definition of a tunnel in section 650.505 of the National Tunnel Inspection Standards (NTIS) must be inspected at intervals based on the requirements in section 650.511, paragraph (b), of the NTIS. The commissioner may require inspections at intervals less than those required by the NTIS based on factors including but not limited to the age and condition of the tunnel, the rate of deterioration of the tunnel, the type of structure, the susceptibility of the tunnel to failure, and traffic characteristics. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [165.18] SUICIDE PREVENTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Data collection. new text end new text begin The commissioner of transportation, in collaboration with the commissioner of health, must identify bridges in Minnesota with a history of suicide-related deaths. The commissioner of transportation must: new text end new text begin (1) annually request and receive data from the commissioner of health regarding known suicide deaths from bridges in the state of Minnesota as obtained from the state's vital statistics records; and new text end new text begin (2) maintain a record of the data to support the identification of bridges for which suicide reduction measures may be appropriate. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Best practices. new text end new text begin The commissioner of transportation, in collaboration with the commissioner of health, must develop a methodology for determining when and where suicide reduction measures should be incorporated into bridge projects. The commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) develop best practices for determining when suicide reduction measures should be considered on a project; new text end new text begin (2) identify potential suicide reduction measures and develop best practices for their appropriate and feasible use; and new text end new text begin (3) develop suicide reduction railing design criteria. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Railing implementation. new text end new text begin Suicide reduction railings must be implemented when determined appropriate and feasible using the methodology developed under subdivision 2. This requirement applies to bridge projects undertaken by the commissioner of transportation and by local road authorities when the project scope includes railing replacement, alteration, or addition, consistent with the design criteria developed under subdivision 2, clause (3). new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Short title. new text end new text begin This section is the "Kayla's HOPE Act." new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.101, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Failure to send to registrar deleted text begin within ten daysdeleted text end . Any person who fails to mail in the application for registration or transfer with appropriate taxes and fees to the registrar of motor vehicles or otherwise fails to submit deleted text begin saiddeleted text end new text begin thenew text end forms and remittance to the registrar within deleted text begin tendeleted text end new text begin 20 calendarnew text end days followingnew text begin thenew text end date of sale deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end guilty of a misdemeanor. Sec. 11. new text begin [168.1236] ARMED FORCES VETERAN SPECIAL PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin General requirements and procedures. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding section 168.1293, the commissioner shall issue a set of special veterans' plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) satisfies the criteria for obtaining a veterans' special plate under section 168.123, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (2) does not meet the criteria for veterans' special plates under section 168.123, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (3) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 24; recreational vehicle as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 27; one-ton pickup truck as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 21b; or motorcycle as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 19; new text end new text begin (4) pays a fee in the amount specified for special plates under section 168.12, subdivision 5, for each set of plates and any other fees required by this chapter; new text end new text begin (5) pays the registration tax required under section 168.013; and new text end new text begin (6) complies with this chapter and rules governing the registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin (b) The applicant must have a certified copy of the applicant's discharge papers, indicating character of discharge, at the time of application. If an applicant served in active military service in a branch of the armed forces of a nation or society allied with the United States in conducting a foreign war and is unable to obtain a record of that service and discharge status, the commissioner of veterans affairs may certify the applicant as qualified for the special veterans' plates provided under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Motorcycle plate. new text end new text begin A motorcycle plate issued under this section must be the same size as a regular motorcycle plate. The commissioner shall only issue one motorcycle plate for a motorcycle registered under subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "branch of the armed forces" means the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, Merchant Marine of the United States, and all other uniformed services as defined in United States Code, title 52, section 20310. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of public safety, in consultation with the commissioner of veterans affairs, must issue a special veterans' plate for each branch of the armed forces. The special plate must bear an inscription "VETERAN" at the bottom of the plate and include a special emblem of the branch of the armed forces. The commissioner of veterans affairs shall design, subject to the approval of the commissioner of public safety, the special emblem for each branch of the armed forces used for the veterans' special plates. The commissioner of public safety shall consult with veterans organizations from each branch of the armed forces on the design of the branch's special veterans' plate. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Plate transfers. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle if the subsequent vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, clause (3); and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Fees. new text end new text begin The fees collected under this section must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705. Except for the fees paid under subdivision 1, the commissioner must issue a set of special veterans' plates, or a single plate for a motorcycle, to an eligible person free of charge and shall replace the plate or plates without charge if they become damaged. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Costs of production. new text end new text begin The commissioner of management and budget may transfer money in the "Support Our Troops" account under section 190.19, subdivision 2a, to the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1, to pay for the cost of production of the license plates authorized under this section. The commissioner of veterans affairs and the commissioner of public safety must agree on a payment schedule before any money may be transferred under this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, for armed forces special veterans' plates issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin [168.1245] DISTINGUISHED FLYING CROSS PLATE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must issue Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a recipient of the Distinguished Flying Cross; new text end new text begin (2) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013; and new text end new text begin (4) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin (b) Application for issuance of Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates may be made only at the time of renewal or first application for registration. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may issue only one set of Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates, or a single plate in the case of a motorcycle, for each qualified applicant. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of veterans affairs, must design an emblem for the special plates that includes the Distinguished Flying Cross medal and includes the phrase "DISTINGUISHED FLYING CROSS." new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin No fee. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue a set of Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates to qualified applicants free of charge, and the plates must be replaced free of charge if they become damaged. No fee may be charged for a subsequent year when a motor vehicle listed in subdivision 1, upon which the Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates are placed, is registered under section 168.017. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 168.12, subdivision 1, Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle upon notification to the commissioner and without payment of a fee if the subsequent motor vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), to bear the special license plates; and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special license plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special license plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin [168.1257] MINNESOTA MAIN STREETS PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue Minnesota Main Streets special plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays a fee in the amount specified under section 168.12, subdivision 5, for each set of plates, along with any other fees required by this chapter; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) contributes a minimum of $30 annually to the Minnesota Main Streets account; and new text end new text begin (5) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin In consultation with the commissioner of employment and economic development, the commissioner must adopt a suitable plate design that includes the phrase "Legendary Landmarks" to evoke the historic sites, commercial districts, and other landmarks that reflect the variety of Minnesota's communities. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle if the subsequent vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, clause (1), to bear the special plates; and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Contributions; account; appropriation. new text end new text begin Contributions collected under subdivision 1, clause (4), must be deposited in the Minnesota Main Streets account, which is established in the special revenue fund. Money in the account is annually appropriated to the commissioner of public safety. The appropriation is first for the annual cost of administering the account, and the remainder is for distribution to Rethos exclusively for the Minnesota Main Streets program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for Minnesota Main Streets plates issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 14. new text begin [168.1261] CURL IN MINNESOTA PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue curl in Minnesota special license plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays a fee in the amount specified for special plates under section 168.12, subdivision 5, along with any other fees required under this chapter; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) contributes a minimum of $30 annually to the Minnesota Curling Association account; and new text end new text begin (5) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin In consultation with the Minnesota Curling Association, the commissioner must adopt a suitable plate design that includes the inscription "Curl in Minnesota." new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle if the subsequent vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, clause (1), to bear the special plates; and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Contributions; account; appropriation. new text end new text begin Contributions collected under subdivision 1, clause (4), must be deposited in the Minnesota Curling Association account, which is established in the special revenue fund. Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner of public safety. This appropriation is first for the annual cost of administering the account funds, and the remaining money is for distribution to the Minnesota Curling Association for maintenance of curling facilities across Minnesota. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.1285, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Issuance of plates. The commissioner must issue Minnesota agriculture special plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, deleted text begin noncommercialdeleted text end one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, new text begin farm truck, new text end or recreational vehicle; (2) pays a fee in the amount specified under section 168.12, subdivision 5, for each set of plates, along with any other fees required by this chapter; (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013new text begin or 168.018new text end ; (4) contributes a minimum of $20 annually to the Minnesota agriculture account; and (5) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 168.1289, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Auto rental company" means a corporation, partnership, individual, or other person that is engaged primarily in the renting of at least 50 rental motor vehicles at per diem rates. (c) "Rental motor vehicle" means a passenger automobile, deleted text begin noncommercialdeleted text end one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, motorized bicycle, or recreational vehicle made available for rental by an auto rental company. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.15, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Transfer of ownership. (a) Upon the transfer of ownership, destruction, theft, dismantling, or permanent removal by the owner from this state of any vehicle registered in accordance with this chapter, the right of the owner of the vehicle to use the registration certificate and plates assigned to the vehicle expires. (b) When the ownership of a vehicle is transferred to another person required to register the vehicle in this state, the transferor deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end assign the registration tax paid to the credit of the transferee unless the registration stickers are surrendered to the commissioner before the first day of the new registration period. (c) When seeking to become the owner by gift, trade, or purchase of any vehicle for which a registration certificate has been issued under this chapter, a person deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end join with the registered owner in transmitting with the application for transfer of ownership, the registration certificate, with the assignment and notice of sale duly executed. (d) In case of loss of the title or certificate of registration of a vehicle not subject to section 325E.15, the person deleted text begin shall makedeleted text end new text begin must submit annew text end application to the commissioner with proof of loss of the title as specified in section 168A.09 and assign a notice of sale of the vehicle on the application for title as specified in section 168A.04. (e) Upon the transfer of any vehicle by a manufacturer or dealer, for use within the state, whether by sale, lease, or otherwise, the transferor deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end , within deleted text begin tendeleted text end new text begin 20 calendarnew text end days after the transfer, file with the commissionernew text begin :new text end (1) a notice containing the date of transfer, a description of the vehicle, and the transferee's name and residence address in the state or if not a natural person then the transferee's business and mailing addressdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end and (2) the transferee's application for registration. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.187, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Registration of proratable vehicles. (a) The commissioner deleted text begin of public safety shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end register proratable vehicles of a fleet upon application and payment of registration fees as provided in subdivision 11. Payment of an additional fee for each vehicle so registered may be required by the commissioner in an amount not to exceed $5 per motor powered vehicle, for issuance of a plate, sticker, or other suitable identification for each vehicle. A registration card deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be issued for each vehicle registereddeleted text begin , which shalldeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end appropriately deleted text begin identifydeleted text end new text begin identifiesnew text end the vehicle for which it is issued. deleted text begin Suchdeleted text end new text begin Thenew text end registration card deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be carried in or upon the vehicle for which it has been issued, at all times, except that the registration cards for all vehicles in a combination of vehicles may be carried in or upon the vehicle supplying the motive power. (b) Fleet vehicles registered as provided in paragraph (a) deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin arenew text end deemed fully registered in this state for any type of movement or operation, except that when a state grant of authority is required for any movement or operation, deleted text begin no suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end vehicle deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin must notnew text end be operated in this state unless thenew text begin vehiclenew text end owner or operator deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end has been granted authority or rights therefore by the state and unless deleted text begin saiddeleted text end new text begin thenew text end vehicle is being operated in conformity with such authority or rights. No registration under this section deleted text begin shall excusedeleted text end new text begin excusesnew text end the owner or operator of any vehicle from compliance with the laws of this state, except those requiring registration and licensing. new text begin (c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner must replace a license plate or sticker that is (1) issued to a proratable vehicle, and (2) defective, lost, or stolen. The commissioner must replace the license plate or sticker under this paragraph upon receiving a sworn statement from the registered owner that affirms the issue with the previously issued license plate or sticker. The vehicle owner must surrender any available plates to the commissioner. A plate, sticker, or filing fee must not be imposed for replacement of a license plate or sticker under this paragraph. new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.27, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Application. new text begin (a) new text end All license applications under this section and all license renewals must be made to the deleted text begin registrar of motor vehiclesdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end and duly verified by oath. The applicant deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end submit deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end information deleted text begin asdeleted text end new text begin required bynew text end the deleted text begin registrar may requiredeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end to administer this section in a manner and format prescribed by the deleted text begin registrardeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end . new text begin (b) Except as provided in paragraphs (c) to (f), a motor vehicle dealer must complete a title and registration application and must submit the application along with the excise and registration taxes and all applicable fees to the commissioner within 20 calendar days of the sale of a vehicle. The dealer must have on file an itemized receipt issued by the department showing a breakdown of the taxes and fees paid. The receipt must be maintained and made available for the commissioner's inspection for three years after the sale of the vehicle. new text end new text begin (c) If the purchaser is not a Minnesota customer, the dealer is not required to complete an application or submit the application, taxes, and fees. new text end new text begin (d) If the purchaser is eligible to pay a prorated tax and provides a prorate account number to the dealer, the dealer must complete and file a title application, but the dealer is not required to collect and submit either the excise tax or registration tax. new text end new text begin (e) If the vehicle is currently registered in Minnesota, the dealer is not required to collect and submit the registration tax. new text end new text begin (f) If the vehicle must have an emissions inspection before registration, the dealer is not required to collect and submit the registration tax. new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.301, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. deleted text begin Ten days to filedeleted text end new text begin Filing periodnew text end . The transferee's rights to the transferred vehicle's registration plates and credit for taxes paid on the vehicle expire deleted text begin after ten days have elapsed from the date of transferdeleted text end unless: (1) the transfer has been filed as provided under section 168A.10; or (2) the transferee is a dealer licensed under section 168.27, and is complying with section 168A.11. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.04, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Secured party. If the application refers to a vehicle purchased from a dealer deleted text begin it shalldeleted text end new text begin , the application mustnew text end contain the name and address of any secured party holding a security interest created or reserved at the time of the sale and the date of the security agreement and be signed by the dealer deleted text begin as well asdeleted text end new text begin andnew text end the ownerdeleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end The dealer deleted text begin shall within ten daysdeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end mail or deliver the application and appropriate taxes to the departmentnew text begin within 20 calendar daysnew text end . Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.151, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Salvage and prior salvage brands. (a) When an insurer, licensed to conduct business in Minnesota, acquires ownership of a vehicle, excluding a recovered intact vehicle, through payment of damages, the insurer must: (1) for a late-model or high-value vehicle, immediately apply for a certificate of title that bears a "salvage" brand or stamp the existing certificate of title with "salvage" in a manner prescribed by the department; or (2) for a vehicle that is not subject to clause (1), immediately apply for a certificate of title that bears a "prior salvage" brand or stamp the existing certificate of title with "prior salvage" in a manner prescribed by the department. (b) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, supporting documents used to transfer ownership of a vehicle to an insurer after payment of damages do not require a notarized signature and may be signed electronically. For purposes of this paragraph, supporting documents include but are not limited to power of attorney forms. The insurer shall indemnify and hold harmless the department for any claims resulting from issuing a certificate of title, salvage title, or junking certificate pursuant to this section. (c) Within deleted text begin tendeleted text end new text begin 20 calendarnew text end days of obtaining the title of a vehicle through payment of damages, an insurer must notify the department in a manner prescribed by the department. (d) Except as provided in section 168A.11, subdivision 1, a person must immediately apply for a certificate of title that bears a "salvage" brand if the person acquires a damaged late-model or high-value vehicle that: (1) was acquired by an insurer through payment of damages; (2) will incur a cost of repairs that exceeds the value of the damaged vehicle; (3) has an out-of-state salvage certificate of title as proof of ownership; or (4) bears the brand "damaged," "repairable," "salvage," or any similar term on the certificate of title. (e) Except as provided in section 168A.11, subdivision 1, a person must immediately apply for a certificate of title that bears a "prior salvage" brand if the person acquires a damaged vehicle and: (1) a "salvage" brand is not required under paragraph (d); and (2) the vehicle: (i) bears the brand "damaged," "repairable," "salvage," "rebuilt," "reconditioned," or any similar term on the certificate of title; or (ii) had a salvage certificate of title or brand issued at any time in the vehicle's history by any other jurisdiction. (f) A self-insured owner of a vehicle that sustains damage by collision or other occurrence which exceeds 80 percent of its actual cash value must: (1) for a late-model or high-value vehicle, immediately apply for a certificate of title that bears a "salvage" brand; or (2) for a vehicle that is not subject to clause (1), immediately apply for a certificate of title that bears a "prior salvage" brand. Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.154, is amended to read: 168A.154 SALVAGE VEHICLE TAKEN OUT OF STATE. A dealer who sells a salvage vehicle to a buyer who intends to remove the vehicle from the state deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end report the sale within deleted text begin tendeleted text end new text begin 20 calendarnew text end days to the department in a format prescribed by the department. Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168B.16, is amended to read: 168B.16 FLASHING LIGHTnew text begin AND VARIABLE MESSAGE SIGNnew text end ON TOW TRUCK. new text begin (a) new text end A tow truck or towing vehicle must be equipped with flashing or intermittent red and amber lights of a type approved by the commissioner of public safety. The lights must be placed on the dome of the vehicle at the highest practicable point visible from a distance of 500 feet. The flashing red light must be displayed only when the tow truck or towing vehicle is engaged in emergency service on or near the traveled portion of a highway. The flashing amber light may be displayed when the tow truck or towing vehicle is moving a disabled vehicle. new text begin (b) A tow truck or towing vehicle may display a portable variable message sign mounted on the tow truck while performing emergency service on or near the traveled portion of a highway. The portable variable message sign must conform to the standards established in the Minnesota Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices. new text end Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, subdivision 40b, is amended to read: Subd. 40b. Micromobility device. (a) "Micromobility device" means a vehicle that: (1) is capable of: (i) being propelled solely by human power; (ii) being powered solely by an electric motor drawing current from rechargeable storage batteries, fuel cells, or other portable sources of electrical current; or (iii) both (i) and (ii); (2) when solely powered by an electric motor, is not capable of propelling the vehicle at a speed greater than deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 20new text end miles per hour on a paved level surface; and (3) has an unloaded weight of up to deleted text begin 500deleted text end new text begin 100new text end pounds. (b) Micromobility device includes a bicycle, a motorized foot scooter, and an electric personal assistive mobility device. deleted text begin Micromobility device includes a motorized bicycle that meets the requirements under paragraph (a).deleted text end Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, subdivision 44, is amended to read: Subd. 44. Motorcycle. new text begin (a) new text end "Motorcycle" means every motor vehicle deleted text begin havingdeleted text end new text begin that:new text end new text begin (1) hasnew text end a seat or saddle for the use of the rider deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) isnew text end designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the grounddeleted text begin , includingdeleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (3) is propelled by an electric or liquid fuel motor. new text end new text begin (b) Motorcycle includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) a vehicle under paragraph (a) or a bicycle that has an electric motor of at least 1,500 watts or that is capable of being propelled by an electric or liquid fuel motor at speeds in excess of 30 miles per hour on a flat surface with not more than one percent grade in any direction; new text end new text begin (2)new text end motor scootersnew text begin ;new text end and new text begin (3)new text end autocycles. new text begin (c) A vehicle is not anew text end motorcycle deleted text begin does not includedeleted text end new text begin if it meets the requirements of:new text end (1)new text begin anew text end motorized deleted text begin bicyclesdeleted text end new text begin bicyclenew text end as defined in subdivision 45deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (2)new text begin annew text end electric-assisted deleted text begin bicyclesdeleted text end new text begin bicyclenew text end as defined in subdivision 27deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (3)new text begin a motorized foot scooter;new text end new text begin (4)new text end a tractordeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5) anew text end roadable aircraft. Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, subdivision 45, is amended to read: Subd. 45. Motorized bicycle. new text begin (a) new text end "Motorized bicycle" means a bicycle new text begin or other vehicle that has a seat for the use of the rider and is designed to travel on not more than two wheels in contact with the ground, new text end that isnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end propelled by an electricnew text begin motor of more than 750 watts but less than 1,500 wattsnew text end or a liquid fuel motor of a piston displacement capacity of 50 cubic centimeters or less, and a maximum of two brake horsepowerdeleted text begin , which isdeleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2)new text end capable of a maximum speed of not more than 30 miles per hour on a flat surface with not more than one percent grade in any direction when the motor is engaged. new text begin (b)new text end Motorized bicycle does not include an electric-assisted bicycle as defined in subdivision 27. Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, subdivision 71, is amended to read: Subd. 71. School bus. (a) "School bus" means a motor vehicle used to transport pupils to or from a school defined in section 120A.22, or to or from school-related activities, by the school or a school district, or by someone under an agreement with the school or a school districtnew text begin , or to provide training on the operation of the vehicle to employees of the school, school district, or a person under an agreement with the school or school districtnew text end . A school bus does not include a motor vehicle transporting children to or from school for which parents or guardians receive direct compensation from a school district, a motor coach operating under charter carrier authority, a transit bus providing services as defined in section 174.22, subdivision 7, or a vehicle otherwise qualifying as a type III vehicle under paragraph (h), when the vehicle is properly registered and insured and being driven by an employee or agent of a school district for nonscheduled or nonregular transportation. (b) A school bus may be type A, type B, type C, or type D, multifunction school activity bus, or type III as provided in paragraphs (c) to (h). (c) A "type A school bus" is a van conversion or bus constructed utilizing a cutaway front section vehicle with a left-side driver's door. This definition includes two classifications: type A-I, with a gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) less than or equal to 14,500 pounds; and type A-II, with a GVWR greater than 14,500 pounds and less than or equal to 21,500 pounds. (d) A "type B school bus" is constructed utilizing a stripped chassis. The entrance door is behind the front wheels. This definition includes two classifications: type B-I, with a GVWR less than or equal to 10,000 pounds; and type B-II, with a GVWR greater than 10,000 pounds. (e) A "type C school bus" is constructed utilizing a chassis with a hood and front fender assembly. The entrance door is behind the front wheels. A "type C school bus" also includes a cutaway truck chassis or truck chassis with cab, with or without a left side door, and with a GVWR greater than 21,500 pounds. (f) A "type D school bus" is constructed utilizing a stripped chassis. The entrance door is ahead of the front wheels. (g) A "multifunction school activity bus" is a school bus that meets the definition of a multifunction school activity bus in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, section 571.3. A vehicle that meets the definition of a type III vehicle is not a multifunction school activity bus. (h) A "type III vehicle" is restricted to passenger vehicles and buses having a maximum manufacturer's rated seating capacity of ten or fewer people, including the driver, and a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less. A "type III vehicle" must not be outwardly equipped and identified as a type A, B, C, or D school bus or type A, B, C, or D Head Start bus. A van or bus converted to a seating capacity of ten or fewer and placed in service on or after August 1, 1999, must have been originally manufactured to comply with the passenger safety standards. (i) In this subdivision, "gross vehicle weight rating" means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a single vehicle. Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application to persons, places, and vehicles. new text begin (a) new text end The provisions of this chapter relating to the operation of vehicles refer exclusively to the operation of vehicles upon highways, and upon highways, streets, private roads, and roadways situated on property owned, leased, or occupied by the regents of the University of Minnesota, or the University of Minnesota, except: (1) where a different place is specifically referred to in a given section; (2) the provisions of sections 169.09 to 169.13 apply to any person who drives, operates, or is in physical control of a motor vehicle within this state or upon the ice of any boundary water of this state, and to any person who drives, operates, or is in physical control of a snowmobile on a snowmobile trail within this state. new text begin (b) A person must not operate a vehicle upon the highways of Minnesota unless, at the time of operation, the vehicle satisfies the specifications of a type of vehicle that is defined in section 169.011. For the purposes of this paragraph, it is not sufficient for the vehicle to only meet the definition of vehicle, as that term is defined in section 169.011, subdivision 92. new text end Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.09, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Officer to report accident to commissioner. (a) A peace officer who investigates in the regular course of duty an accident that is required to be reported under this section must submit an electronic or written report of the accident to the commissioner of public safety within ten days after the date of the accident. Within two business days after identification of a fatality that resulted from an accident, the reporting agency must notify the commissioner of the basic circumstances of the accident. A report or notification under this subdivision must be in the format as prescribed in subdivision 9. (b) Accidents on streets, highways, roadways, sidewalks, shoulders, shared use paths, or any other portion of a public right-of-way must be reported under the requirements of this section if the accident results in: (1) a fatality; (2) bodily injury to a person who, because of the injury, immediately receives medical treatment away from or at the scene of the accident; (3) one or more of the motor vehicles incurring disabling damage that requires a vehicle to be transported away from the scene of the accident by tow truck or other vehicle; or (4) damage to fixtures, infrastructure, or any other property alongside or on a highway. (c) An accident involving a school bus, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 71, must be reported under the requirements of this section and section 169.4511. (d) An accident involving a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in section 169.781, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), must be reported under the requirements of this section and section 169.783. (e) Accidents occurring on public lands or trail systems that result in the circumstances specified in paragraph (b) must be reported under the requirements of this section. new text begin (f) An accident involving an electric-assisted or a motorized bicycle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivisions 27 and 45, that results in the circumstances specified in paragraph (b) must be reported under the requirements of this section. new text end Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.222, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Traffic laws apply. (a) Every person operating a bicycle has all of the rights and duties applicable to the driver of any other vehicle by this chapter, except in respect to those provisions in this chapter relating expressly to bicycles and in respect to those provisions of this chapter which by their nature cannot reasonably be applied to bicycles. This deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin paragraphnew text end applies to a bicycle operating on the new text begin roadway or the new text end shoulder of a roadway. (b) A person lawfully operating a bicycle (1) on a sidewalk, or (2) across a roadway or shoulder while using a crosswalk has all the rights and duties applicable to a pedestrian under the same circumstances. Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.222, subdivision 6a, is amended to read: Subd. 6a. Electric-assisted bicycle; riding rules. (a) A person may operate an electric-assisted bicycle in the same manner as provided for operation of other bicycles, including but not limited to operation on the shoulder of a roadway, a bicycle lane, and a bicycle route, and operation without the motor engaged on a bikeway or bicycle trail. (b) A person may operate a class 1 or class 2 electric-assisted bicycle with the motor engaged on a bicycle path, bicycle trail, or shared use path unless prohibited under section 85.015, subdivision 1d; 85.018, subdivision 2, paragraph (d); or 160.263, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), as applicable. (c) A person may operate a class 3 electric-assisted bicycle or multiple mode electric-assisted bicycle with the motor engaged on a bicycle path, bicycle trail, or shared use path unless the local authority or state agency having jurisdiction over the bicycle path or trail prohibits the operation. (d) The local authority or state agency having jurisdiction over a trail or over a bike park that is designated as nonmotorized and that has a natural surface tread made by clearing and grading the native soil with no added surfacing materials may regulate the operation of an electric-assisted bicycle. (e) A person under the age of 15 must not operate an electric-assisted bicycle. new text begin (f) A person under the age of 18 must wear protective headgear that meets or exceeds the standards under Code of Federal Regulations, title 16, part 1203, or successor requirements while operating an electric-assisted bicycle. new text end Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.222, subdivision 6b, is amended to read: Subd. 6b. Electric-assisted bicycle; equipment. (a) The manufacturer or distributor of an electric-assisted bicycle must apply a label to the bicycle that is permanently affixed in a prominent location. The label must contain the class number, top assisted speed, and motor wattage of the electric-assisted bicycle, and must be printed in a legible font with at least 9-point type. A multiple mode electric-assisted bicycle must have labeling that identifies the highest class or each of the electric-assisted bicycle classes in which it is capable of operating. (b) A person must not modify an electric-assisted bicycle to change the motor-powered speed capability or motor engagement so that the bicycle no longer meets the requirements for the applicable class, unless: (1) the person replaces the label required in paragraph (a) with revised information; or (2) for a vehicle that no longer meets the requirements for any electric-assisted bicycle class, the person removes the labeling as an electric-assisted bicyclenew text begin and replaces it with labeling that conforms with the requirements of section 169.223, subdivision 6new text end . (c) An electric-assisted bicycle must operate in a manner so that the electric motor is disengaged or ceases to function: (1) when the brakes are applied; or (2) except for a class 2 electric-assisted bicycle or a multiple mode electric-assisted bicycle operating in class 2 mode, when the rider stops pedaling. (d) A class 3 electric-assisted bicycle or multiple mode electric-assisted bicycle must be equipped with a speedometer that displays the speed at which the bicycle is traveling in miles per hour. (e) A multiple mode electric-assisted bicycle equipped with a throttle must not be capable of exceeding 20 miles per hour on motorized propulsion alone in any mode when the throttle is engaged. Sec. 34. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.223, is amended to read: 169.223 MOTORIZED BICYCLE. Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Safety equipment; parkingdeleted text end new text begin Rules for motorcycles apply; exceptionsnew text end . Section 169.974 relating to motorcycles is applicable to motorized bicycles, except as otherwise provided in this section and except that: (1) protective headgear includes headgear that meets new text begin or exceedsnew text end the standards under Code of Federal Regulations, title 16, part 1203, or successor requirementsnew text begin and is only required for operators under 18 years of agenew text end ;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (2) a motorized bicycle equipped with a headlight and taillight meeting the requirements of lighting for motorcycles may be operated during nighttime hours; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) protective headgear is not required for operators 18 years of age or older; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end the provisions of section 169.222, subdivision 9, governing the parking of bicycles apply to motorized bicycles. Subd. 2. License or permit. (a) A motorized bicycle may be operated under either a driver's license or a motorized bicycle permit issued under section 171.02, subdivision 3. (b) A person under the age of 16 operating a motorized bicycle under a motorized bicycle permit is subject to the restrictions imposed by section 169.974, subdivision 2, on operation of a motorcycle under a two-wheel instruction permit, except thatdeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end a parent or guardian of an operator under the age of 16 may also ride on the motorized bicycle as a passenger or operator if the motorized bicycle is equipped with a seat and footrests for a second passengerdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (2) a motorized bicycle equipped with a headlight and taillight meeting the requirements of lighting for motorcycles may be operated during nighttime hours; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) protective headgear includes headgear described in subdivision 1; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4) protective headgear is required only until the operator reaches the age of 18 years. deleted text end Subd. 3. Sidewalknew text begin , path,new text end and passenger prohibitions. deleted text begin No person shalldeleted text end new text begin (a) A person must notnew text end operate a motorized bicycle upon a sidewalk at any time, except when such operation is necessary for the most direct access to a roadway from a driveway, alley or building. deleted text begin No person shalldeleted text end new text begin (b) A person must not operate a motorized bicycle on a bicycle path or shared use path at any time. new text end new text begin (c) A person must not new text end operate a motorized bicycle that is carrying any person other than the operator, except as allowed under subdivision 2. Subd. 4. Headlight requirement. The provisions of section 169.974, subdivision 5, paragraph deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (l)new text end , apply to motorized bicycles deleted text begin that are equipped with headlights. A new motorized bicycle sold or offered for sale in Minnesota must be equipped with a headlightdeleted text end . Subd. 5. Other operation requirements and prohibitions. (a) A person operating a motorized bicycle on a roadway shall ride as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway except in one of the following situations: (1) when overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction; (2) when preparing for a left turn at an intersection or into a private road or driveway; or (3) when reasonably necessary to avoid conditions, including fixed or moving objects, vehicles, pedestrians, animals, surface hazards, or narrow width lanes, that make it unsafe to continue along the right-hand curb or edge. (b) Persons operating motorized bicycles on a roadway may not ride more than two abreast and may not impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic. On a laned roadway, a person operating a motorized bicycle shall ride within a single lane. (c) deleted text begin This section does not permit the operation ofdeleted text end A motorized bicycle new text begin must not be operated new text end on a bicycle path or bicycle lane that is reserved for the exclusive use of nonmotorized traffic. new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Labeling. new text end new text begin The manufacturer or distributor of a motorized bicycle must apply a label to the motorized bicycle that is permanently affixed in a prominent location. The label must contain the top assisted speed and the motor wattage of the motorized bicycle, and must be printed in a legible font with at least 9-point type. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Electrical safety standards. new text end new text begin No person may sell a motorized bicycle powered by an electric motor unless the motorized bicycle: new text end new text begin (1) has been certified by an independent third party ISO-17065 certified laboratory for compliance with ANSI/CAN/UL Standard 2272 and bears the certification mark of the laboratory; or new text end new text begin (2) has been certified by the vehicle manufacturer for compliance with SAE International standard J2929 or a similar applicable electrical safety standard approved by the commissioner of public safety. new text end Sec. 35. new text begin [169.2231] MOTORIZED BICYCLE SAFETY COORDINATOR. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Motorized bicycle safety coordinator. new text end new text begin There is established a position of motorized bicycle safety coordinator in the Department of Public Safety, within the Office of Traffic Safety. The commissioner of public safety shall designate the coordinator. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The duties of the coordinator include: new text end new text begin (1) educating state and local law enforcement and the public about the laws governing electric-assisted bicycles, motorized bicycles, motorized foot scooters, other micromobility devices, and motorcycles; new text end new text begin (2) assisting state and local law enforcement in identifying and categorizing the vehicles described in clause (1); new text end new text begin (3) creating and maintaining a database of manufacturers of the vehicles in clause (1) that classifies the manufacturers' products under state law; new text end new text begin (4) providing timely support to law enforcement to assist in identifying vehicles and applicable state law and rules; and new text end new text begin (5) providing technical assistance and advice related to the investigation and enforcement of sections 169.222, 169.223, and 325F.661. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Requirements. new text end new text begin The motorized bicycle safety coordinator must consult with the active transportation advisory committee regarding educational materials, vehicle classifications, and any policy recommendations provided under subdivision 2. new text end Sec. 36. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.448, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Restrictions on appearance; misdemeanor. (a) A bus that is not used as a school bus must not be operated on a street or highway unless it is painted a color significantly different than national school bus glossy yellow. (b) A bus that is not used as a school bus or Head Start bus may not be operated if it is equipped with school bus or Head Start bus-related equipment and printing. (c) A violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor. (d) This subdivision does not apply to a school bus owned by or under contract to a school district operated as a charter or leased bus. (e) This subdivision does not apply to a school bus operated by a licensed child care provider if: (1) the stop-signal arm is removed; (2) the lighting systems for prewarning flashing amber signals, flashing red signals, and supplemental warnings under section 169.4503, subdivision 31, are deactivated; (3) the school bus is identified as a "child care bus" in letters at least eight inches high on the front and rear top of the bus; (4) the name, address, and telephone number of the owner or operator of the bus is identified on each front door of the bus in letters not less than three inches high; and (5) the conditions under section 171.02, subdivision 2a, paragraphs (a) to (j) and (l), have been met. new text begin (f) This subdivision does not apply to a bus operated by a licensed commercial driver training school under sections 171.33 to 171.41. The bus's stop-signal arm, and lighting systems for prewarning flashing amber signals, flashing red signals, and supplemental warnings under section 169.4503, subdivision 31, must not be used on a public street or highway. new text end Sec. 37. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.449, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin USDOT number. new text end new text begin Any person, district, or operator providing school transportation using a school bus, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 71, must apply for a USDOT number to be used for tracking inspections conducted pursuant to section 169.451. new text end Sec. 38. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.454, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. deleted text begin First aid kit anddeleted text end Body fluids cleanup kit. A deleted text begin minimum of a ten-unit first aid kit, and adeleted text end body fluids cleanup kit is required. deleted text begin Theydeleted text end new text begin The kitnew text end must be contained innew text begin anew text end removable, moisture- and dust-proof deleted text begin containersdeleted text end new text begin containernew text end mounted in an accessible place within the driver's compartment and must be marked to indicate deleted text begin theirdeleted text end new text begin the kit'snew text end identity deleted text begin and locationdeleted text end . Sec. 39. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.454, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin First aid kit. new text end new text begin A first aid kit meeting the requirements as defined in the current version of the National School Transportation Specifications and Procedures (NSTSP) must be provided in vehicles model year 2027 and newer. All other vehicles may contain a minimum of a ten-unit first aid kit, as specified in Minnesota Rules 1993, part 3520.5120, or a first aid kit meeting the requirements of the NSTSP. After January 1, 2030, all type III vehicles must be equipped with a first aid kit meeting the requirements of the NSTSP. new text end Sec. 40. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.974, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Electrical safety standards. new text end new text begin No person may sell a motorcycle powered by an electric motor unless the motorcycle has been certified by the vehicle manufacturer for compliance with: new text end new text begin (1) the latest revision of SAE International standard J2929; or new text end new text begin (2) a similar applicable standard from SAE International, International Organization for Standardization (ISO), United Nations Economic Commission for Europe (UNECE), or International Electrotechnical Commission (IEC), or another electrical safety standard. new text end new text begin A standard under clause (2) must be approved by the commissioner of public safety. new text end Sec. 41. new text begin [169.981] SALE OR TRANSFER OF PUBLIC SAFETY VEHICLE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "Public safety vehicle" has the same meaning as "authorized emergency vehicle" in section 169.011, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin A person may not sell or transfer a public safety vehicle to the public unless the person first removes any equipment or insignia that could mislead a reasonable person to believe that the vehicle is a public safety vehicle, including any emergency light, siren, amber warning light, spotlight, grill light, antenna, emblem, outline of an emblem, or emergency vehicle equipment. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Certificate of compliance. new text end new text begin (a) Public safety agencies, before consummating the sale or transfer of a public safety vehicle, must provide a certificate of compliance to the transferee confirming that the vehicle has had the public safety markings removed. new text end new text begin (b) Sellers and auction houses, before consummating the sale or transfer of a public safety vehicle, must provide a certificate of compliance to the transferee confirming that the vehicle has had the public safety markings removed. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner of public safety must design a standard certificate of compliance form and make the form publicly available without fee on the agency's publicly accessible website using existing appropriations. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin (a) A person who sells or transfers a public safety vehicle to the public in violation of this section is liable for: new text end new text begin (1) damages proximately caused by the use of that vehicle during the commission of a crime; and new text end new text begin (2) a civil penalty of $2,500. new text end new text begin (b) Civil penalties collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the Minnesota victims of crime account created in section 299A.708. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin The attorney general may bring an action to recover the civil penalty established under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Sales or transfers of public safety vehicles to members of the public for purpose of collection or display are exempt from the requirements of this section if the vehicle is owned and operated solely as a collector's item and not for general transportation purposes and is registered under section 168.10, subdivision 1a, 1b, 1c, 1d, 1g, or 1h. new text end Sec. 42. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.04, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Persons not eligible. The department shall not issue a driver's license: (1) to any person under 18 years unless: (i) the applicant is 16 or 17 years of age and has a previously issued valid license from another state or country or the applicant has, for the 12 consecutive months preceding application, held a provisional license and during that time has incurred (A) no conviction for a violation of section 169A.20, 169A.33, 169A.35, sections 169A.50 to 169A.53, or section 171.177, (B) no conviction for a crash-related moving violation, and (C) not more than one conviction for a moving violation that is not crash related. "Moving violation" means a violation of a traffic regulation but does not include a parking violation, vehicle equipment violation, or warning citation; (ii) the application for a license is approved by (A) either parent when both reside in the same household as the minor applicant or, if otherwise, then (B) the parent or spouse of the parent having custody or, in the event there is no court order for custody, then (C) the parent or spouse of the parent with whom the minor is living or, if subitems (A) to (C) do not apply, then (D) the guardian having custody of the minor, (E) the foster parent or director of the transitional living program in which the child resides or, in the event a person under the age of 18 has no living father, mother, or guardian, or is married or otherwise legally emancipated, then (F) the minor's adult spouse, adult close family member, or adult employer; provided, that the approval required by this item contains a verification of the age of the applicant and the identity of the parent, guardian, adult spouse, adult close family member, or adult employer; and (iii) the applicant presents a certification by the person who approves the application under item (ii), stating that the applicant has driven a motor vehicle accompanied by and under supervision of a licensed driver at least 21 years of age for at least ten hours during the period of provisional licensure; (2) to any person who is 18 years of age or younger, unless the person has applied for, been issued, and possessed the appropriate instruction permit for a minimum of six months, and, with respect to a person under 18 years of age, a provisional license for a minimum of 12 months; (3) to any person who is 19 years of age or older, unless that person has applied for, been issued, and possessed the appropriate instruction permit for a minimum of three months; (4) to any person whose license has been suspended during the period of suspension except that a suspended license may be reinstated during the period of suspension upon the licensee furnishing proof of financial responsibility in the same manner as provided in the Minnesota No-Fault Automobile Insurance Act; (5) to any person whose license has been revoked except upon furnishing proof of financial responsibility in the same manner as provided in the Minnesota No-Fault Automobile Insurance Act and if otherwise qualified; (6) to any drug-dependent person, as defined in section 254A.02, subdivision 5; (7) to any person who has been adjudged legally incompetent by reason of mental illness, mental deficiency, or inebriation, and has not been restored to capacity, unless the department is satisfied that the person is competent to operate a motor vehicle with safety to persons or property; (8) to any person who is required by this chapter to take a vision, knowledge, or road examination, unless the person has successfully passed the examination. An applicant who fails four road tests must complete a minimum of six hours of behind-the-wheel instruction with an approved instructor before taking the road test again; (9) to any person who is required under the Minnesota No-Fault Automobile Insurance Act to deposit proof of financial responsibility and who has not deposited the proof; (10) to any person when the commissioner has good cause to believe that the operation of a motor vehicle on the highways by the person would be inimical to public safety or welfare; (11) to any person when, in the opinion of the commissioner, the person is afflicted with or suffering from a physical or mental disability or disease that will affect the person in a manner as to prevent the person from exercising reasonable and ordinary control over a motor vehicle while operating it upon the highways; (12) to a person who is unable to read and understand official signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic; (13) to a child for whom a court has ordered denial of driving privileges under section 260C.201, subdivision 1, or 260B.235, subdivision 5, until the period of denial is completed; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (14) to any person whose license has been canceled, during the period of cancellationdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (15) to any person 20 years of age or under who has not completed a driver education program that includes both classroom instruction and behind-the-wheel training. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 43. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6c. new text end new text begin Speech condition identifier. new text end new text begin (a) Upon the written request of the applicant, the commissioner must issue a driver's license or Minnesota identification card bearing a graphic or written identifier for a speech condition or disorder, including but not limited to stuttering. The commissioner must not include any specific medical information on the driver's license or Minnesota identification card. new text end new text begin (b) On request of the applicant and payment of the required fee, the department must issue a replacement or renewal license or identification card without the designation. new text end Sec. 44. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.12, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Driver and vehicle services information system; security and auditing. (a) The commissioner must establish written procedures to ensure that only individuals authorized by law may enter, update, or access not public data collected, created, or maintained by the driver and vehicle services information system. An authorized individual's ability to enter, update, or access data in the system must correspond to the official duties or training level of the individual and to the statutory authorization granting access for that purpose. All queries and responses, and all actions in which data are entered, updated, accessed, shared, or disseminated, must be recorded in a data audit trail. Data contained in the audit trail are public to the extent the data are not otherwise classified by law. (b) If the commissioner determines that an individual willfully entered, updated, accessed, shared, or disseminated data in violation of state or federal law, the commissioner must impose disciplinary action. If an individual willfully gained access to data without authorization by law, the commissioner must forward the matter to the appropriate prosecuting authority for prosecution. The commissioner must not impose disciplinary action against an individual who properly accessed data to complete an authorized transaction or to resolve an issue that did not result in a completed authorized transaction. (c) The commissioner must establish a process that allows an individual who was subject to disciplinary action to appeal the action. If the commissioner imposes disciplinary action, the commissioner must notify the individual in writing of the action, explain the reason for the action, and explain how to appeal the action. The commissioner must transmit the notification within five calendar days of the action. deleted text begin (d) The commissioner must arrange for an independent biennial audit of the driver and vehicle services information system to determine whether data currently in the system are classified correctly, how the data are used, and to verify compliance with this subdivision. The results of the audit are public. No later than 30 days following completion of the audit, the commissioner must provide a report summarizing the audit results to the commissioner of administration; the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees of the house of representatives and the senate with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance, public safety, and data practices; and the Legislative Commission on Data Practices and Personal Data Privacy. The report must be submitted as required under section 3.195, except that printed copies are not required. deleted text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end For purposes of this subdivision, "disciplinary action" means a formal or informal disciplinary measure, including but not limited to requiring corrective action or suspending or revoking the individual's access to the driver and vehicle information system. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 45. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.12, subdivision 7b, is amended to read: Subd. 7b. Data privacy; noncompliant license or identification card. (a) With respect to noncompliant licenses or identification cards, the commissioner is prohibited from: (1) electronically disseminating outside the state data that is not disseminated as of May 19, 2017; or (2) utilizing any electronic validation or verification system accessible from or maintained outside the state that is not in use as of May 19, 2017. (b) The limitations in paragraph (a) do not apply to the extent necessary to: (1) maintain compliance with the driver's license compact under section 171.50 and applicable federal law governing commercial driver's licenses; (2) perform identity verification as part of an application for a replacement Social Security card issued by the Social Security Administration; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) perform identity verification for a program participant in the Transportation Security Administration's Registered Traveler program who has voluntarily provided their Minnesota driver's license or identification card to confirm their identity to a private entity operating under the Registered Traveler programdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) validate or verify a United States passport, certificate of citizenship, or certificate of naturalization submitted with an application for a noncompliant license or identification card. new text end (c) For purposes of paragraph (b), clause (3), the information provided for identity verification is limited to name, date of birth, the license or identification card's identification number, issuance date, expiration date, and credential security features which does not include facial recognition. (d) For purposes of this subdivision, "outside the state" includes federal agencies, states other than Minnesota, organizations operating under agreement among the states, and private entities. (e) Prior to disclosing to a data requester, other than the data subject, any data on individuals relating to a noncompliant driver's license or identification card, the commissioner or a driver's license agent must require the data requester to certify that the data requester must not use the data for civil immigration enforcement purposes or disclose the data to a state or federal government entity that primarily enforces immigration law or to any employee or agent of any such government entity. A data requester who violates the certification required in this paragraph may be liable in a civil action brought under section 13.08, may be subject to criminal penalties under section 13.09, may have subsequent requests for noncompliant driver's license or identification card data be denied by the commissioner, and may lose access to the driver records subscription service under section 168.327. A certification form used by the commissioner or a driver's license agent under this paragraph must include information about penalties that apply for violations. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2026, for noncompliant license and identification card applications submitted on or after that date. new text end Sec. 46. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.187, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Suspension required. The commissioner shall suspend the driver's license of a person: (1) for whom a peace officer has made the certification described in section 629.344 that probable cause exists to believe that the person violated section 609.2112, subdivision 1, paragraph (a)deleted text begin , clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6)deleted text end ; 609.2113, subdivision 1, deleted text begin clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6); subdivisiondeleted text end 2, deleted text begin clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6);deleted text end or deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end 3deleted text begin , clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6)deleted text end ; or 609.2114, subdivision 1deleted text begin , paragraph (a), clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6),deleted text end or deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end 2deleted text begin , clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6)deleted text end ; or (2) who has been formally charged with a violation of section 609.20, 609.205, 609.2112, 609.2113, or 609.2114, resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to certifications made on or after that date. new text end Sec. 47. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 171.187, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Credit. If a person whose driver's license was suspended under subdivision 1 is later convicted of the underlying offense that resulted in the suspension and the commissioner revokes the person's license, the commissioner shall credit the time accrued under the suspension period toward the revocation period imposed under section 171.178, subdivision 6, or for violations of section: (1) 609.20; (2) 609.205; (3) 609.2112, subdivision 1, paragraph (a)deleted text begin , clause (1), (7), or (8)deleted text end ; (4) 609.2113deleted text begin , subdivision 1deleted text end deleted text begin , clause (1), (7), or (8); subdivision 2, clause (1), (7), or (8); or subdivision 3, clause (1), (7), or (8)deleted text end ; or (5) 609.2114deleted text begin , subdivision 1deleted text end deleted text begin , paragraph (a), clause (1), (7), or (8), or subdivision 2, clause (1), (7), or (8)deleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 48. new text begin [174.205] RESILIENT PAVEMENT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Baseline project" means a trunk highway project without revision to pavement design life. new text end new text begin (c) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of transportation. new text end new text begin (d) "Modified project" means a project that is revised or under a revision analysis to contain a modified pavement design life using funds provided under the program. new text end new text begin (e) "Pavement cost" means the estimated total cost of pavement items, including pavement foundation, for the project, in conformance with standard specifications for construction established by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (f) "Program" means the resilient pavement program under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program established. new text end new text begin Subject to available funds, the commissioner must establish a resilient pavement program to provide supplemental funding for revisions to pavement design of trunk highway projects on the basis of long-term cost effectiveness. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin (a) In implementing the program, the commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) establish procedures for identification, analysis, and selection of projects that receive funding and are accordingly revised in the pavement design; and new text end new text begin (2) specify a modified pavement design life, whether through pavement material, pavement foundation, or a combination, that is at least 50 years for modified projects. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must determine pavement design life using the current standard models used by the department for pavement design. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Project eligibility; cost effectiveness. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible for funds under the program, a project must: new text end new text begin (1) be for trunk highway construction, reconstruction, maintenance, or improvement; new text end new text begin (2) be included in a prior or the current state transportation improvement program or capital highway investment plan with a proposed design life of less than or equal to 20 years; new text end new text begin (3) be a modified project with a pavement design life as specified under subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (2); and new text end new text begin (4) have a cost-effectiveness ratio, as calculated under paragraph (b), that equals or is greater than one. new text end new text begin (b) The cost-effectiveness ratio is calculated as: new text end new text begin (1) the pavement cost of the baseline project, divided by the pavement design life of the baseline project; divided by new text end new text begin (2) the pavement cost of the modified project, divided by the modified pavement design life. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Use of funds. new text end new text begin (a) For a project selected under the program, the commissioner may expend program funds for up to 110 percent of the difference in anticipated pavement costs between the modified project and the baseline project. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not expend funds under the program for program delivery. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Public information. new text end new text begin The commissioner must publish information regarding the program on the department's website. The information must include: new text end new text begin (1) a description of program implementation; new text end new text begin (2) identification of projects analyzed and selected under the program; and new text end new text begin (3) for each project selected, an overview that includes a brief project description, the pavement design changes, and information on expenditures from program funds. new text end Sec. 49. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 174.38, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Use of funds. (a) The commissioner must determine permissible uses of financial assistance under this section, which are limited to: (1) construction and maintenance of bicycle, trail, and pedestrian infrastructure, including but not limited to safe routes to school infrastructure and bicycle facilities and centers; and (2) noninfrastructure programming, including activities as specified in section 174.40, subdivision 7a, paragraph (b). (b) Of the amount made available in each fiscal year, the firstnew text begin ten percent, up tonew text end $500,000new text begin ,new text end is for deleted text begin grantsdeleted text end new text begin programmingnew text end to develop, maintain, and implement active transportation safety curriculum for youth ages five to 14 years old, and if remaining funds are available, for (1) youth ages 15 to 17 years old, (2) adult active transportation safety programs, and (3) adult learn-to-ride programs. The curriculum must include resources for teachers and must meet the model training materials requirements under section 123B.935, subdivision 4. Sec. 50. new text begin [174.68] TRUCK PARKING IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of transportation. new text end new text begin (c) "Program" means the truck parking improvement program established in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program established. new text end new text begin A truck parking improvement program is established to support improvements related to truck parking access, availability, and safety. Money may be appropriated from the trunk highway fund or the general fund for truck parking capacity improvements at public, private, or partnership-operated sites. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Program administration. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish program requirements in conformance with this section, including but not limited to a competitive process for project evaluation and discretionary award of financial assistance. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must conduct a solicitation for projects under the program in each fiscal year for which money is available. The commissioner must make reasonable efforts to publicize each solicitation among all eligible recipients. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may authorize expenditures, provide grants, enter into partnerships with local governments or private entities, including truck stops, or provide other financial assistance for a truck parking improvement project. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner is prohibited from expending more than three percent of available money in a fiscal year under this section on program administration. new text end new text begin (e) No actions taken under this section are to be construed as authorizing the commercialization of any public rest area. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin Eligible recipients of financial assistance under this section are: new text end new text begin (1) the Department of Transportation; new text end new text begin (2) a county; new text end new text begin (3) a statutory or home rule charter city that receives aid from the municipal state-aid street fund under chapter 162; new text end new text begin (4) a statutory or home rule charter city or a town in partnership with a political subdivision under clause (2) or (3); new text end new text begin (5) a metropolitan planning organization; new text end new text begin (6) a public or private port authority; new text end new text begin (7) an established truck stop business, commercial warehouse site, large retail company, or trucking service repair company; and new text end new text begin (8) an entity operating under a public-private partnership authorized by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Project evaluation. new text end new text begin In developing and maintaining criteria to evaluate applications, the commissioner must gather input from the Minnesota Freight Advisory Committee and consult with the Statewide Freight Investment Committee. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Use of money. new text end new text begin Financial assistance under the program may be used for: new text end new text begin (1) predesign, design, engineering, acquisition of land or permanent easements, environmental analysis and remediation, construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of truck parking facilities; new text end new text begin (2) construction and maintenance of truck parking information systems; new text end new text begin (3) construction and maintenance of bathroom facilities that serve truck parking facilities; new text end new text begin (4) installation and relocation of utilities necessary for additional truck parking capacity; new text end new text begin (5) local match for federal grants for truck safety, truck parking, and hydrogen or electric truck fueling improvements; new text end new text begin (6) truck parking studies; and new text end new text begin (7) lighting, fencing, or security systems that are appurtenant to the construction of new parking spaces at a public rest area, an established truck stop business, commercial warehouse site, large retail company, or trucking service repair company. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Public information. new text end new text begin The commissioner must publish information regarding the program on the department's website. The information must include: new text end new text begin (1) an overview of program requirements and implementation; new text end new text begin (2) identification of all projects considered in each project selection round; and new text end new text begin (3) a review of each selected project, with amounts and sources of funding. new text end Sec. 51. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216D.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Electronic positive response. new text end new text begin "Electronic positive response" means an electronic notification from an operator to the notification center regarding the status of a locate in the area of a proposed excavation or boundary survey. new text end Sec. 52. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216D.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Electronic positive response. new text end new text begin The notification center must make an electronic positive response from an operator available to the relevant excavator through electronic means. new text end Sec. 53. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216D.04, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Locating underground facility; operator. (a) Prior to the conclusion of the locate period, an operator must locate and mark or otherwise provide the approximate horizontal location of the underground facilities of the operator and provide readily available information regarding the operator's abandoned and out-of-service underground facilities as shown on maps, drawings, diagrams, or other records used in the operator's normal course of business, without cost to the excavator.new text begin Prior to the conclusion of the locate period, an operator must provide an electronic positive response through the notification center for the notice of excavation.new text end The excavator must determine the precise location of the underground facility, without damage, before excavating within two feet of the marked location of the underground facility. (b) Within 96 hours or the time specified in the notice, whichever is later, after receiving a notice for boundary survey from the notification center, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, unless otherwise agreed to between the land surveyor and operator, an operator must locate and mark or otherwise provide the approximate horizontal location of the underground facilities of the operator, without cost to the land surveyor.new text begin Prior to the conclusion of the time period under this paragraph, an operator must provide an electronic positive response through the notification center for the notice for boundary survey.new text end (c) For the purpose of this section, the approximate horizontal location of the underground facilities is a strip of land two feet on either side of the underground facilities. (d) Markers used to designate the approximate horizontal location of underground facilities are subject to the following requirements: (1) markers must be a combination of paint markings and at least one of the following: (i) a flag or flags, (ii) a stake or stakes, or (iii) a whisker or whiskers; (2) all markers under clause (1) must follow the current color code standard used by the American Public Works Association; (3) markers must be located within a plus or minus two-foot tolerance; and (4) the name of the operator must be indicated on each flag, stake, or whisker. If the surface being marked is hard, markers without flags, stakes, or whiskers may be used but must comply with the color code standard and tolerance requirement under clauses (2) and (3). (e) If the operator cannot complete marking of the excavation or boundary survey area before the excavation or boundary survey start time stated in the notice, the operator must promptly contact the excavator or land surveyor. (f) Operators must maintain maps, drawings, diagrams, or other records of any underground facility abandoned or out-of-service after December 31, 1998. (g) An operator or other person providing information pursuant to this subdivision is not responsible to any person, for any costs, claims, or damages for information provided in good faith regarding abandoned, out-of-service, or private or customer-owned underground facilities. (h) An operator must use geospatial location information or an equivalent technology to develop as-built drawings of newly installed or newly abandoned facilities if exposed in the excavation area. The requirements under this paragraph apply (1) on or after January 1, 2026, or (2) on or after January 1, 2027, for an operator that provided services to fewer than 10,000 customers in calendar year 2025. new text begin (i) An operator must provide up-to-date contact information to the notification center (1) as the contact changes occur, to the extent practicable, and (2) on at least a quarterly basis following a change in contact information. The contact information must include at least one telephone number designated by the operator to reach a person or persons regarding locates. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, except that paragraph (i) is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 54. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 219.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Crossing bells. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding this section or any other law or rule to the contrary, the commissioner must not order or allow crossing bells to be silenced at any railroad crossing equipped with an active warning system. new text end Sec. 55. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 222.50, is amended to read: 222.50 RAIL SERVICE IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. Creation. deleted text begin There is createddeleted text end The rail service improvement programnew text begin is creatednew text end to provide assistance for improvement of rail service in the state. Subd. 2. Identifying deteriorating rail line. The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end identify those rail lines that have deteriorated or are in danger of deteriorating so as to be unable to carry the speeds and weights necessary to efficiently transport the goods and products moved or sought to be moved on the lines. Subd. 3. Commissioner's powers; rules. The commissioner deleted text begin shall havedeleted text end new text begin hasnew text end the power to: (1) set priorities for the allocation and expenditure of money or in kind contributions authorized under the rail service improvement program and develop criteria for eligibility and approval of projects under the program. The criteria deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end include the anticipated economic and social benefits to the state and to the area being served and the economic viability of the project; (2) negotiate and enter into contracts for rail line rehabilitation or other rail service improvement; (3) disburse state and federal money for rail service improvements; and (4) adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 222.46 to 222.54. Subd. 4. Contract. The commissioner may negotiate and enter into contracts for the purpose of rail service improvement and may incorporate funds available from the federal government. The participants in these contracts deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be railroads, rail users, and the department, and may be political subdivisions of the state and the federal government. deleted text begin In such contracts,deleted text end Participation by all parties deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin in these contracts mustnew text end be voluntary. The commissioner may provide a portion of the money required to carry out the terms of deleted text begin any such contractdeleted text end new text begin these contractsnew text end by expenditure from deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end rail service improvement account. Subd. 5. Contractual conditions. In making any contract pursuant to subdivision 4new text begin ,new text end the commissioner may: (1) stipulate minimum operating standards for rail lines designed to achieve reasonable transportation service for shippers and to achieve best use of funds invested in rail line rehabilitation; (2) require a portion of the total assistance for improving a rail line to be loaned to the railroad by rail users and require the railroad to reimburse rail users for any loan on the basis of use of the line and the revenues produced when the line has been improved; (3) determine the terms and conditions under which all or any portion of state funds allocated deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be repaid to the department by the railroads. Reimbursement may be made as a portion of the increased revenue derived from the improved rail line. Anynew text begin loannew text end reimbursement received by the department pursuant to this clause deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin for any project financed with state general obligation bond funds mustnew text end be deposited in the rail service improvement accountnew text begin in the bond proceeds fundnew text end and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin any loan reimbursement received by the department pursuant to this clause for any other projects must be deposited in the rail service improvement account in the special revenue fund. Reimbursements received under this clause mustnew text end be appropriated exclusively for rehabilitating other rail lines in the state pursuant to subdivision 4; and (4) to the extent not prohibited by federal law or regulation, require that when the railroad elects to contract for portions of the rehabilitation work or rail service improvement, the railroad must select a contractor who is experienced in rail rehabilitation workdeleted text begin ,deleted text end and must require the contractor to: (i) recruit any new workers from the area where the work is to be done; and (ii) pay workers under the contract wages that are equal to or greater than the wages the railroad pays its own workers for similar work, but not less than twice the state minimum wage that state-covered employers are required to pay under section 177.24, subdivision 1, paragraph (a). Subd. 6. Grants. The commissioner may approve grants from deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end rail service improvement account for freight rail service improvements that support economic development. Subd. 7. Expenditures. (a) The commissioner may expend money from deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end rail service improvement account for the following purposes: (1) to make transfers as provided under section 222.57 or to pay interest adjustments on loans guaranteed under the state rail user and rail carrier loan guarantee program; (2) to pay a portion of the costs of capital improvement projects designed to improve rail service of a rail user or a rail carrier; (3) to pay a portion of the costs of rehabilitation projects designed to improve rail service of a rail user or a rail carrier; (4) to acquire, maintain, manage, and dispose of railroad right-of-way pursuant to the state rail bank program; (5) to provide for aerial photography survey of proposed and abandoned railroad tracks for the purpose of recording and reestablishing by analytical triangulation the existing alignment of the inplace track; (6) to pay a portion of the costs of acquiring a rail line by a regional railroad authority established pursuant to chapter 398A; (7) to pay the state matching portion of federal grants for rail-highway grade crossing improvement projects; (8) to pay the nonfederal matching portion of federal grants for freight rail projects that support economic development; (9) to fund rail planning studies; and (10) to pay a portion of the costs of capital improvement projects designed to improve capacity or safety at rail yards. (b) All money derived by the commissioner from the disposition of railroad right-of-way or of any other property acquired pursuant to sections 222.46 to 222.62 deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be deposited in the rail service improvement accountnew text begin in the special revenue fundnew text end . Sec. 56. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Killed in the line of duty. (a) "Killed in the line of duty" does not include new text begin any new text end deaths from natural causes, except as new text begin expressly new text end provided in this subdivision. In the case of a public safety officer, killed in the line of duty includes the death of a public safety officer caused by accidental means while the public safety officer is acting in the course and scope of duties as a public safety officer. Killed in the line of duty also deleted text begin meansdeleted text end new text begin includesnew text end if a public safety officer dies as the direct and proximate result of a heart attack, stroke, or vascular rupture, that officer deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin is new text end presumed to have died as the direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained in the line of duty if: (1) that officer, while on duty: (i) engaged in a situation, and that engagement involved nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical new text begin activity in new text end law enforcement, fire suppression, rescue, hazardous material response, emergency medical services, prison security, disaster relief, or other emergency response activity; or (ii) participated in a training exercise, and that participation involved nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity; (2) that officer died as a result of a heart attack, stroke, or vascular rupture suffered: (i) while engaging or participating under clause (1); (ii) while still on duty after engaging or participating under clause (1); or (iii) not later than 24 hours after engaging or participating under clause (1); and (3) the presumption is not overcome by competent medical evidence to the contrary. (b) "Killed in the line of duty" also deleted text begin meansdeleted text end new text begin includesnew text end that the officer died due to suicide: (1) secondary to a diagnosis of posttraumatic stress disorder as described in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association; or (2) within 45 days of the end of exposure, while on duty, to a traumatic event. new text begin (c) "Killed in the line of duty" also includes that the officer died as a result of complications caused by exposure sustained in the line of duty to any of the following infectious diseases, viruses, or bacteria, if medical records identify the disease, virus, or bacteria as a cause of or contributing factor to the death: COVID-19, influenza, hepatitis B, hepatitis C, tuberculosis, HIV/AIDS, meningitis, MRSA, whooping cough, or streptococcus pneumoniae. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 57. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Nonroutine strenuous physical activity. new text end new text begin "Nonroutine strenuous physical activity" means line-of-duty activity that: new text end new text begin (1) is not an action of a clerical, administrative, or nonmanual nature; new text end new text begin (2) is not performed as a matter of routine; and new text end new text begin (3) entails an unusually high level of physical exertion. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 58. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3b. new text end new text begin Nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity. new text end new text begin "Nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity" means nonroutine stressful physical activity or nonroutine strenuous physical activity. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 59. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3c. new text end new text begin Nonroutine stressful physical activity. new text end new text begin "Nonroutine stressful physical activity" means line-of-duty activity that: new text end new text begin (1) is not an action of a clerical, administrative, or nonmanual nature; new text end new text begin (2) is not performed as a matter of routine; new text end new text begin (3) entails nonnegligible physical exertion; and new text end new text begin (4) occurs: new text end new text begin (i) with respect to a situation in which a public safety officer is engaged under circumstances that objectively and reasonably: new text end new text begin (A) pose or appear to pose significant dangers, threats, or hazards, or reasonably foreseeable risks thereof, not faced by similarly situated members of the public in the ordinary course; and new text end new text begin (B) provoke, cause, or occasion an unusually high level of alarm, fear, or anxiety; or new text end new text begin (ii) with respect to a training exercise in which a public safety officer participates under circumstances that objectively and reasonably: new text end new text begin (A) simulate in realistic fashion situations that pose significant dangers, threats, or hazards; and new text end new text begin (B) provoke, cause, or occasion an unusually high level of alarm, fear, or anxiety. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 60. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Public safety officer. "Public safety officer" includes: (1) a peace officer defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c) or (d); (2) a correction officer employed at a correctional facility and charged with maintaining the safety, security, discipline, and custody of inmates at the facility; (3) a corrections staff person working in a public agency and supervising offenders in the community as defined in sections 243.05, subdivision 6; 244.19, subdivision 1; and 401.01, subdivision 2; (4) an individual employed on a full-timenew text begin or part-timenew text end basis by the state or by a fire department of a governmental subdivision of the state, who is engaged in any of the following duties: (i) firefighting; (ii) emergency motor vehicle operation; (iii) investigation into the cause and origin of fires; (iv) the provision of emergency medical services; or (v) hazardous material responder; (5) a legally enrolled member of a volunteernew text begin or paid on-callnew text end fire department or member of an independent nonprofit firefighting corporation who is engaged in the hazards of firefighting; (6) a good samaritan while complying with the request or direction of a public safety officer to assist the officer; (7) a reserve police officer or a reserve deputy sheriff while acting under the supervision and authority of a political subdivision; (8) a driver or attendant with a licensed basic or advanced life-support transportation service who is engaged in providing emergency care; (9) a first responder who is certified by the director of the Office of Emergency Medical Services to perform basic emergency skills before the arrival of a licensed ambulance service and who is a member of an organized service recognized by a local political subdivision to respond to medical emergencies to provide initial medical care before the arrival of an ambulance; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (10) a person, other than a state trooper, employed by the commissioner of public safety and assigned to the State Patrol, whose primary employment duty is either Capitol security or the enforcement of commercial motor vehicle laws and regulationsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (11) a person formerly employed as a public safety officer under clauses (1) to (5) or (7) to (10) if the person separated from service due to a duty disability, as defined in section 353.01, subdivision 41. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 61. new text begin [299A.412] DETERMINING WHAT IS ROUTINE. new text end new text begin Neither of the following is dispositive in determining whether an activity or action is understood to have been performed as a matter of routine under section 299A.41: new text end new text begin (1) being generally described by the public safety agency as routine or ordinary; or new text end new text begin (2) the frequency with which the activity or action may be performed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 62. new text begin [299A.96] EMERGENCY CONTACT INFORMATION FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin (c) "Elected official" means a state executive officer, member of the legislature, justice of the supreme court, or member of the state's federal congressional delegation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Submitting contact information to commissioner. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of subdivision 4, an elected official is encouraged to submit and verify annually by January 31 to the commissioner in a format prescribed by the commissioner the following information: new text end new text begin (1) primary residential address; new text end new text begin (2) any secondary address in the state; new text end new text begin (3) work telephone number; new text end new text begin (4) home telephone number; new text end new text begin (5) email address; and new text end new text begin (6) list and contact information of immediate family members. new text end new text begin (b) An elected official is encouraged to notify the commissioner as soon as possible after changing any information under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Data classification. new text end new text begin All information submitted under subdivision 2 is classified as private data on individuals under section 13.02, subdivision 12. The data may be accessed by only authorized personnel for official public safety purposes when used or disclosed under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Using and disclosing information. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may use or disclose information under subdivision 2 only as follows: new text end new text begin (1) to ensure the safety and security of elected officials or their immediate family members; or new text end new text begin (2) for law enforcement purposes when needed for protecting public safety. new text end new text begin (b) Use or disclosure of the information under subdivision 2 is subject to the remedies and penalties under sections 13.08 and 13.09. new text end Sec. 63. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299D.03, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Salary and reimbursement. (a) Each employee other than the chief supervisor, lieutenant colonel, majors, captains, new text begin lieutenants, new text end corporals, and sergeants hereinafter designated shall be known as patrol troopers. (b) There may be appointed one lieutenant colonel; and such majors, captains, new text begin lieutenants, new text end corporals, sergeants, and troopers as the commissioner deems necessary to carry out the duties and functions of the State Patrol. Persons in above-named positions shall be appointed by law and have such duties as the commissioner may direct and, except for troopers, shall be selected from the patrol troopers, corporals, sergeants, captains, new text begin lieutenants, new text end and majors who shall have had at least five years' experience as either patrol troopers, corporals, sergeants, or supervisors. (c) The salary rates for all State Patrol troopers, corporals, and sergeants shall be deemed to include $6 per day reimbursement for shift differential, meal and business expenses incurred by State Patrol troopers, corporals, and sergeants in the performance of their assigned duties in their patrol areas; business expenses include, but are not limited to: uniform costs, home garaging of squad cars, and maintenance of home office. Sec. 64. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299D.03, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Salary deleted text begin and benefitsdeleted text end survey. (a) By January 1 of 2021, 2024, 2027, and deleted text begin 2030deleted text end new text begin every odd-numbered year thereafternew text end , the legislative auditor must conduct a compensation deleted text begin and benefitdeleted text end survey of law enforcement officers in every police department: (1) in a city with a population in excess of 25,000, located in a metropolitan county, as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 4, that is represented by a union certified by the Bureau of Mediation Services; or (2) in a city of the first class. The State Patrol must also be included in the survey. (b) The legislative auditor must base the survey on compensation deleted text begin and benefitsdeleted text end for the past completed calendar year. The survey must be based on full-time equivalent employees. The legislative auditor must calculate compensation using base salary, overtime wages, and premium pay. Premium pay is payment that is received by a majority of employees and includes but is not limited to education pay and longevity pay. The legislative auditor must not include any payments made to officers or troopers for work performed for an entity other than the agency that employs the officer or trooper, regardless of who makes the payment. deleted text begin The legislative auditor must also include in the survey all benefits, including insurance, retirement, and pension benefits. The legislative auditor must include contributions from both the employee and employer when determining benefits.deleted text end (c) The legislative auditor must compile the survey results into a report. The report must show each department separately. For each department, the survey must includedeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end an explanation of the salary structure, and include minimum and maximum salaries for each range or stepdeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (2) an explanation of benefits offered, including the options that are offered and the employee and employer contribution for each option. deleted text end deleted text begin Wherever possible, the report must be designed so that the data for each department is in the same table or grid format to facilitate easy comparison. deleted text end (d) By January 15 of 2021, 2024, 2027, and deleted text begin 2030deleted text end new text begin every odd-numbered year thereafternew text end , the legislative auditor must transmit the survey report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees with jurisdiction over the State Patrol budget. (e) It is the legislature's intent to use the information in this study to compare salaries between the identified police departments and the State Patrol and to make appropriate increases to patrol troopernew text begin , captain, and lieutenantnew text end salaries. new text begin Nothing in this subdivision precludes the collective bargaining of salaries or compensation in excess of salaries or compensation supported by the salary survey. Salary adjustments for supervisory ranks, including corporals, sergeants, lieutenants, and captains, must be proportionate to the salary adjustments made for patrol troopers resulting from the survey. This subdivision does not expand the scope of the salary survey beyond patrol troopers. new text end For purposes of this paragraph, "patrol troopers" has the meaning given in subdivision 2, paragraph (a). Sec. 65. new text begin [299D.14] VOLUNTEER CHAPLAINS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Volunteers permitted. new text end new text begin The commissioner or the chief supervisor of the State Patrol may recruit, train, and accept, without regard to personnel laws or rules, the services of individuals without compensation as volunteer chaplains to support members of the State Patrol in their roles and responsibilities under this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Incidental expenses. new text end new text begin The chief supervisor may provide for the incidental expenses of a volunteer chaplain, including transportation, lodging, and subsistence. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application of law. new text end new text begin Except as otherwise provided in this section, a volunteer chaplain is not a state employee and is not subject to the provisions of law relating to state employment, including but not limited to those governing hours of work, rates of compensation, leave, unemployment benefits, and state employee benefits. new text end Sec. 66. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 360.021, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authority to establish. The commissioner is authorized and empowered, on behalf of and in the name of this state, within the limitation of available appropriations, to acquire, by purchase, gift, devise, lease, condemnation proceedings, or otherwise, property, real or personal, for the purpose of establishing and constructing restricted landing areas and other air navigation facilities and to acquire in like manner, own, control, establish, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, regulate, and police such restricted landing areas and other air navigation facilities, either within or without this state; and to make, prior to any such acquisition, investigations, surveys, and plans. The commissioner may maintain, equip, operate, regulate, and police airports, either within or without this state. The operation and maintenance of airports is an essential public service. The commissioner may maintain at such airports facilities for the servicing of aircraft and for the comfort and accommodation of air travelers. The commissioner may dispose of any such property, airport, restricted landing area, or any other air navigation facility, by sale, lease, or otherwise, in accordance with the laws of this state governing the disposition of other like property of the state. The commissioner may not acquire or take over any restricted landing area, or other air navigation facility without the consent of the owner. The commissioner shall not acquire any additional state airports nor establish any additional state-owned airports. The commissioner may erect, equip, operate, and maintain on any airport buildings and equipment necessary and proper to maintain, and conduct such airport and air navigation facilities connected therewith. The commissioner shall not expend money for land acquisition, or for the construction, improvement, or maintenance of airports, or for air navigation facilities for an airport, unless the municipality, county, or joint airport zoning board involved has or is establishing a zoning authority for that airport, and the authority has made a good-faith showing that it is in the process of and will complete with due diligence, an airport zoning ordinance in accordance with sections 360.061 to 360.074. The commissioner may provide funds to support airport safety projects that maintain existing infrastructure, regardless of a zoning authority's efforts to complete a zoning regulation. The commissioner may withhold funding from only the airport subject to the proposed zoning ordinance. deleted text begin Notwithstanding the foregoing prohibition, the commissioner may continue to maintain the state-owned airport at Pine Creek.deleted text end Sec. 67. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 629.344, is amended to read: 629.344 CRIMINAL VEHICULAR OPERATION AND MANSLAUGHTER; CERTIFICATION OF PROBABLE CAUSE BY PEACE OFFICER. If a peace officer determines that probable cause exists to believe that a person has violated section 609.2112, subdivision 1, paragraph (a)deleted text begin , clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6)deleted text end ; 609.2113, subdivision 1, deleted text begin clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6); subdivisiondeleted text end 2, deleted text begin clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6);deleted text end or deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end 3deleted text begin , clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6)deleted text end ; or 609.2114, subdivision 1deleted text begin , paragraph (a), clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6);deleted text end or deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end 2deleted text begin , clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6)deleted text end , the officer shall certify this determination and notify the commissioner of public safety. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to determinations by a peace officer that probable cause exists made on or after that date. new text end Sec. 68. Laws 2024, chapter 104, article 1, section 2, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. This section is effective the day following final enactment deleted text begin and expires January 1, 2032deleted text end . This section applies to contracts entered into on or after the effective date deleted text begin but before January 1, 2032deleted text end . Sec. 69. new text begin COORDINATION WITH METROPOLITAN COUNCIL.new text end new text begin (a) This section applies to the reconstruction of any segment of Hennepin County Road 22 that coincides with a segment of an arterial bus rapid transit candidate corridor, as adopted by the Metropolitan Council in its transportation policy plan by July 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) In order to minimize future construction related to enhanced bus stops that are part of a potential separate future project of the Metropolitan Council, Hennepin County must coordinate with the Metropolitan Council to identify what infrastructure or provisions are needed to accommodate implementation of enhanced bus stops with a roadway project identified in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) Following identification of necessary infrastructure and provisions, Hennepin County must incorporate into final design and construction of the roadway project elements consistent with future construction of enhanced bus stops and coordinate with the Metropolitan Council to install electrical, communications network, and other infrastructure consistent with enhanced bus stop amenities wherever doing so would minimize future construction related to enhanced bus stops. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment without local approval pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 645.023, subdivision 1. new text end Sec. 70. new text begin DRIVER'S EDUCATION FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PILOT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of employment and economic development. new text end new text begin (c) "Eligible entities" means a school district; city; county; town; local government unit; federally recognized Tribe, as defined in United States Code, title 25, section 5304(e); or nonprofit organization that provides assistance to low-income or disadvantaged youth. new text end new text begin (d) "Eligible youth" means a person who is at least 15 years of age and not more than 24 years of age and meets one of the criteria specified in subdivision 4, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (e) "Driver's education" means an online self-paced or in-person driver's education course offered by a public school or a commercial driver training school as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 171.33, subdivision 1, that is licensed and authorized to offer driver's education courses in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (f) "Driver's license" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 171.01, subdivision 37. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Pilot program established. new text end new text begin A driver's education financial assistance program is established as a pilot project under the administration of the Department of Employment and Economic Development to award grants to eligible entities to expand access and availability to driver's education courses and drivers' licenses for eligible youth. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must solicit applications from eligible entities and select not more than four eligible entities to participate in the pilot program. The commissioner must solicit applications from and give special consideration to selecting eligible entities to participate in the program that collectively have experience working with urban, rural, suburban, and Tribal communities. new text end new text begin (b) An eligible entity that wishes to participate in the program must demonstrate in its application that it has: new text end new text begin (1) existing capacity and expertise to identify eligible youth; new text end new text begin (2) strong ties to the community it intends to work with; and new text end new text begin (3) a plan to work with school districts and other community-based organizations to identify and establish an application procedure to recruit and support up to 50 eligible youth in the pilot program. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must provide a grant to an eligible entity selected to participate under this subdivision to provide financial assistance to eligible youth under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin (a) A person seeking financial assistance under the pilot program must meet one of the following criteria: new text end new text begin (1) has experienced homelessness in the last 24 months, as defined under the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, United States Code, title 42, section 1143a; new text end new text begin (2) is a homeless youth, as defined by the Homeless Youth Act in Minnesota Statutes, section 256K.45; new text end new text begin (3) receives housing support under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 256I; new text end new text begin (4) is a child placed in foster care who is no more than 18 years old; new text end new text begin (5) is a foster child who is at least 18 years old and no more than 21 years old and who receives extended foster care benefits under Minnesota Statutes, section 142A.609 or 260C.451; new text end new text begin (6) is a parent or legal custodian of a minor child who receives Minnesota family investment program assistance under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 142G; new text end new text begin (7) is a participant who is no more than 16 years old in a juvenile diversion or restorative justice program; new text end new text begin (8) is a child who is no more than 16 years old and who is out of school, out of work, and enrolled in a workforce program; or new text end new text begin (9) is a youth with a demonstrated and evidenced financial hardship, lack of valid driver's license, and inability to secure driver's education instruction. new text end new text begin (b) Assistance awarded under this section to an eligible youth must not exceed $500. An eligible youth receiving an award under this section must use the funds to make use of private or public driver's education pathways. Eligible uses of the funds include: new text end new text begin (1) the full cost of attending driver's education, including behind-the-wheel instruction; new text end new text begin (2) instructional permit and driver's license application fees; new text end new text begin (3) the full cost of a road test, including rental or other fees related to use of a vehicle for the test; or new text end new text begin (4) other courses or materials designed to assist in securing a valid driver's license. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Records. new text end new text begin (a) Participating eligible entities must keep records of financial assistance awarded to individuals and all expenses associated with appropriated money. new text end new text begin (b) A participating eligible entity must not use more than ten percent of the total appropriation received for administrative costs. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Data collection and outcomes. new text end new text begin To collect uniform data to measure the nature and extent of the need for support to complete the driver's license process, participating entities must collect and make available to the commissioner the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the number of persons who applied for financial assistance; new text end new text begin (2) the number of awards issued to eligible youth and the amount of financial assistance; new text end new text begin (3) the average amount per award issued to eligible youth; and new text end new text begin (4) the number of award recipients who were successful in acquiring a driver's license. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin (a) By February 1 of each year, participating entities must submit a report to the commissioner itemizing all expenditures and grants made to individuals during the previous calendar year. The report must be in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. Participating entities must assist the commissioner in preparing the report required under paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) By January 15, 2028, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation and employment and economic development. The report must describe the activities of the pilot program. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The pilot program established under this section expires June 30, 2028. new text end Sec. 71. new text begin PUBLIC EDUCATION CAMPAIGN; ELECTRIC-ASSISTED AND MOTORIZED BICYCLE SAFETY.new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety must implement a statewide information campaign to educate the public about the safe and lawful operation of electric-assisted and motorized bicycles. new text end Sec. 72. new text begin PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER DEATH BENEFIT RETROACTIVE CLAIMS.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.47, claims for benefits arising out of deaths occurring before July 1, 2026, that are eligible due to the retroactive changes made in this act are timely if filed before July 1, 2028. Claims for benefits arising out of deaths that occur on or after July 1, 2026, are subject to the limitation period under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.47. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.47, the commissioner of public safety must: new text end new text begin (1) review previously denied benefit claims for deaths occurring between February 1, 2020, and the effective date of this act; new text end new text begin (2) determine whether the applicant is eligible for benefits based on the retroactive application of the amendments made in this act; and new text end new text begin (3) award applicable benefits according to Minnesota Statutes, sections 299A.41 to 299A.46. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 73. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin (a) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.14, subdivisions 6, 12, 12a, 15, 17, and 50, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin (b) new text end new text begin Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 5, article 4, section 141, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin (c) new text end new text begin Minnesota Rules, part 7400.5200, subpart 4, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Paragraph (b) is effective the day following final enactment. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: S3988-1 161.14 NAMES AND DESIGNATIONS OF CERTAIN HIGHWAYS. Subd. 6. Veterans' Evergreen Memorial Drive. (a) That portion of Road No. 185, known as Trunk Highway 23 in St. Louis, Pine, and Carlton Counties, is hereby named and designated "Veterans' Evergreen Memorial Drive" in memory of veterans of St. Louis, Pine, and Carlton Counties. (b) The commissioner shall install a bronze plaque with an inscription to read, "In grateful memory of all men and women from Carlton, Pine, and St. Louis Counties who served in World War I, World War II, Korea, Vietnam, and all future conflicts." Subd. 12. Hiawatha Pioneer Trail. (a) The following route is named and designated the "Hiawatha Pioneer Trail": Beginning at Trunk Highway No. 61 on the boundary line between the states of Minnesota and Wisconsin; thence northwesterly on Trunk Highway No. 61 to junction with Trunk Highway No. 12 in St. Paul; thence westerly and southwesterly on Trunk Highways No. 12 and No. 5 to Fort Snelling; thence southwesterly on Trunk Highway No. 3 to Faribault; thence westerly on Trunk Highway No. 99 to St. Peter; thence southerly on Trunk Highway No. 22 to Mankato; thence westerly on Trunk Highway No. 68 to Sleepy Eye; thence northerly on Trunk Highway No. 4 to Fairfax; thence westerly on Trunk Highway No. 19 to junction with Trunk Highway No. 67; thence northerly on Trunk Highway No. 67 to Granite Falls; thence southwesterly on Trunk Highway No. 23 to junction with Trunk Highway No. 14; thence westerly on Trunk Highway No. 14 to Lake Benton; thence southerly on Trunk Highway No. 75 to Pipestone; thence easterly on Trunk Highway No. 30 to Slayton; thence southerly on Trunk Highway No. 59 to Worthington; thence easterly on Trunk Highway No. 16 to Jackson; thence southerly on Trunk Highway No. 71 to the boundary line between the states of Minnesota and Iowa. (b) The route of the "Hiawatha Pioneer Trail" designated in paragraph (a) of this subdivision is the main route of the trail. The following routes are named and designated as the alternate southern route and the alternate northern route of the "Hiawatha Pioneer Trail." (c) The alternate southern route is described as follows: Commencing at the junction of Trunk Highway No. 61, on the main route, and Trunk Highway No. 14, north and west of Winona, thence westerly on Trunk Highway No. 14 to Owatonna; thence northerly on Trunk Highway No. 3 to Faribault, and connecting to the main route. (d) The alternate northern route is described as follows: Commencing at the junction of Trunk Highway No. 12, on the main route, and Trunk Highway No. 10 in the city of St. Paul; thence northerly on Trunk Highway No. 10 to Little Falls, to junction Trunk Highway No. 371; thence northerly on Trunk Highway No. 371 to Brainerd and junction with Trunk Highway No. 18; thence easterly on Trunk Highway No. 18 to Garrison and junction with Trunk Highway No. 169; thence southerly on Trunk Highway No. 169 to junction with Trunk Highway No. 65; thence northerly on Trunk Highway No. 65 to Jacobsen, and junction with Trunk Highway No. 34; thence easterly on Trunk Highway No. 34 to junction with Trunk Highway No. 2; thence easterly and southerly on Trunk Highway No. 2 to Duluth and junction with Trunk Highway No. 23; thence southerly and westerly on Trunk Highway No. 23 to Sandstone and junction of Trunk Highway No. 61, thence southerly on Trunk Highway No. 61 to North Branch and junction with Trunk Highway No. 95; thence easterly and southerly on Trunk Highway No. 95 to Stillwater and junction with Trunk Highway No. 212; thence southerly and westerly to Trunk Highway No. 12 on the main route in the city of St. Paul. (e) The commissioner of transportation shall adopt a suitable marking design with which the commissioner shall mark or blaze the highways heretofore described over which the "Hiawatha Pioneer Trail" is located. Subd. 12a. Hiawatha Pioneer Trail; alternate route. The following route is designated as an alternate route of the "Hiawatha Pioneer Trail": Commencing at the junction of Trunk Highway No. 61, on the main route, and Trunk Highway No. 58, at Red Wing, thence southwesterly on Trunk Highway No. 58, to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 52, at Zumbrota. The commissioner shall mark the route as provided in subdivision 12. Subd. 15. Glacial Ridge Trail. (a) The following route is named and designated the "Glacial Ridge Trail": Beginning at the junction of Trunk Highway No. 71, at its intersection with Trunk Highway No. 12, in Willmar; thence extending north and northeasterly along Trunk Highway No. 71 to its intersection with Kandiyohi County Highway 90; thence extending east along said Highway 90 to its junction with Kandiyohi County State-Aid Highway (SAH) 9; thence extending north and northeasterly along said Highway 9 to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 26; thence extending east along said Highway 26 to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 8; thence extending north along said Highway 8 to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 10, south of Green Lake; thence northerly along said Highway 10 to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 30 in Spicer; thence extending northerly and easterly along said Highway 30 to its junction with Kandiyohi County SAH 2; thence extending northerly on said Highway 2 to a highway easterly of Long Lake and on the north side of Irving Township; thence westerly and southerly on the township road through Sections 4 and 5 of Irving Township to Kandiyohi County Highway 103 to its junction with a township road running south through Sections 6, 7, and 18 of Irving Township to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 40; thence west on said Highway 40, across Trunk Highway No. 23 to the junction of SAH 40 and SAH 9 in the city of New London; thence via city streets to Trunk Highway No. 9 in New London; thence extending westerly on said Highway No. 9, to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 71; thence southerly on said Highway No. 71 to Kandiyohi County SAH 48; thence westerly through Sibley State Park and northerly, across Trunk Highway No. 9, to Colfax Township road running westerly through Sections 27, 22, 21, 20, and 19, of said township, and Section 24 of Norway Lake Township to Kandiyohi County Road 1, thence north to the township road on the south side of Sections 13 and 14 of Norway Lake Township to Kandiyohi County Road 115 to its junction with Kandiyohi County SAH 36 and west on said Highway 36 to a Norway Lake Township Road running northerly through Section No. 5 to the Pope County line and there joining a township road in Section 32 of Lake Johanna Township; thence northerly and westerly through Sections 32 and 31 to Trunk Highway No. 104; thence northerly on said Highway No. 104 to a township road; running westerly through Sections 24 and 23 of Gilchrist Township to Pope County Highway 84; thence westerly on said Highway 84 to the west side of Section No. 15; thence northerly and westerly on a township road through Sections 16 and 17 to Pope County SAH 8; thence north on said Highway 8, in Section No. 8, to a township road; thence in a general northwesterly direction on township roads to Trunk Highway No. 104. And beginning in the Community of Terrace, in Section No. 33 of Chippewa Falls Township, Pope County, Minnesota; thence northwesterly on Pope County SAH 21 to a township road; thence westerly on said township road to Trunk Highway No. 104; thence along said Highway No. 104 in a westerly and northerly direction to Pope County SAH 18; thence westerly on said Highway 18 to Pope County SAH 17; thence northerly on said Highway 17 to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 104; thence northerly to Trunk Highway No. 28 in Glenwood; thence easterly on said Highway No. 28 to its junction with Pope County SAH 25; thence northerly and easterly to the city of Villard; thence to Trunk Highway No. 28 and easterly to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 71; thence northerly on said Highway No. 71 to the city of Sauk Centre. And beginning in the city of Villard on Pope County SAH 28; thence westerly on said SAH 28 to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 29. And beginning at the south limits of the city of Alexandria on Trunk Highway No. 29; thence southerly to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 55; thence southeasterly to 14th Avenue Northeast and the adjacent Mount Lookout Rest Area in the city of Glenwood; thence westerly on said 14th Avenue NE to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 29; thence southerly on said Highway No. 29 to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 104 in the city of Glenwood. And beginning in the city of Glenwood at the junction of Trunk Highway No. 104 and Lakeshore Drive; thence westerly on Lakeshore Drive into the city of Long Beach to Golf Course Road; thence on Golf Course Road to Trunk Highway No. 29; thence on said Highway No. 29 to Pope County SAH 24; thence westerly on said SAH 24 to the Pelican Lake Road; thence southerly on said road to Trunk Highway No. 29; thence southerly and westerly on said Highway No. 29 through the city of Starbuck to Pope County SAH 41; thence southerly on said SAH 41 to Glacial Lakes State Park. And beginning on Pope County SAH 41 at its junction with Pope County Highway 74; thence easterly on said County Highway 74 to its junction with Pope County SAH 13; thence southerly on said SAH 13 to its junction with a township road on the north side of Section 5 of Rolling Forks Township; thence easterly on said township road through Sections 5, 4, and 3 of Rolling Forks Township; said road continuing as the township road through Sections 34, 35, and 36 of Barsness Township to its junction with Pope County SAH 19. And beginning at the junction of Trunk Highway No. 104 and Pope County SAH 19; thence southerly on said SAH 19 to the Swift County line where it becomes Swift County SAH 25; thence on said SAH 25 to the Swift Falls Community Park. And beginning at the junction of Swift County SAH 25 and Swift County Highway 87; thence southerly and easterly on said Highway 87 to its junction with a township road in Section 12 of Camp Lake Township; thence easterly and northerly on township roads through Sections 12 and 1 of Camp Lake Township to a junction with a township road in Section No. 6 of Kerkhoven Township; thence easterly and southerly on township roads through Sections No. 6, 5, 4, 3, 2, and 11 to its junction with Swift SAH 28; thence easterly on said SAH 28 to its junction with Swift County Highway 95; thence southerly on said Highway 95 through Monson Lake Memorial Park to its junction with Swift County SAH 18; thence easterly on said SAH 18 to the Kandiyohi county line where it becomes Kandiyohi County SAH 40; thence on said SAH 40 to Trunk Highway No. 104. And beginning at the junction of Kandiyohi County SAH 36 and a township road in Section No. 8 of Norway Lake Township; thence southerly on said SAH 36 to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 9; thence on said Highway No. 9 to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 104; thence south on said Highway No. 104, through the city of Sunburg to the junction of said Highway No. 104 and Kandiyohi County SAH 40; thence easterly on said SAH 40 to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 5. And beginning at the junction of Kandiyohi County SAH 48 and SAH 38; thence southerly on said SAH 38 to Kandiyohi County SAH 40; thence westerly on said SAH 40 to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 5; thence southerly on said SAH 5 to its junction with a township road in Section No. 9 of Dovre Township; thence easterly on said township road through Sections No. 9, 10, and 11 to its intersection with Kandiyohi County SAH 27; thence easterly on said SAH 27 to its junction with a township road in Section No. 13 of Dovre Township; thence on said township road through Sections No. 13, 14, 23, 25, and 36 of Dovre Township to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 71. (b) The respective road authorities of the highways over which the route described in this subdivision is located shall place and maintain the "Glacial Ridge Trail" emblem, an arrowhead design with red, black, and white colors, on the highways under their jurisdiction to adequately mark the highways as "Glacial Ridge Trail." (c) The state Transportation Department shall make sufficient additional markers to enable the counties to mark those portions of the trail not maintained by the state. Subd. 17. Hiawatha-Appleblossom Scenic Drive. (a) The following described route is named and designated the "Hiawatha-Appleblossom Scenic Drive." Beginning at a point in LaCrescent on Houston County State-Aid Highway 29; thence extending northerly along Houston County State-Aid Highway 29 to the Winona County line; thence extending northerly and westerly along Winona County State-Aid Highway 1 to its junction with Winona County State-Aid Highway 12; thence easterly along Winona County State-Aid Highway 12 to its intersection with Trunk Highway marked 61 in Dakota and there terminating. Also from the junction of Winona County State-Aid Highway 1 and Winona County State-Aid Highway 12; thence westerly and northerly along Winona County State-Aid Highway 12 to its intersection with Winona County State-Aid Highway 3; thence easterly and northerly along Winona County State-Aid Highway 3 to its intersection with Trunk Highway marked 61 and there terminating. (b) The respective road authorities having jurisdiction of the highways over which the route described in paragraph (a) is located shall adopt and place suitable marking signs on their respective highways to adequately mark the route as "Hiawatha-Appleblossom Scenic Drive." Subd. 50. King of Trails. (a) The following described route, signed as Trunk Highway 75 on July 1, 2001, is designated the "King of Trails": Constitutional Route No. 6 from its intersection with the Minnesota-Canada border southerly to its intersection with Legislative Route No. 175 at or near the city of Crookston, then Legislative Route No. 175 southwesterly and southerly to its intersection with Constitutional Route No. 6 between the cities of Halstad and Hendrum, then Constitutional Route No. 6 southerly to its intersection with the Minnesota-Iowa border. (b) The commissioner shall adopt a suitable marking design to mark the highway and erect appropriate signs, subject to section 161.139. Repealed Minnesota Session Laws: S3988-1 Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 5, article 4, section 141 Sec. 141. new text begin DRIVER'S LICENSE SAME-DAY ISSUANCE PILOT PROJECT.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety must conduct a same-day driver's license pilot project as described in this section. The pilot project must be in the cities of Lakeville and Moorhead and include any driver's license agent in either city that requests to participate in the pilot project. This section applies to driver's license agents participating in the pilot project. new text end new text begin (b) An applicant who submits a properly completed application for a noncompliant driver's license, instruction permit, or identification card must be provided with the license or card at the time of the application. The license or card must be processed and produced at the site of the application. The applicant must not be required to go to another location to receive the license or card. The applicant must not be provided with a temporary license or card. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must provide the participating driver's license agents with any necessary equipment to process and produce the driver's licenses and identification cards on site. new text end new text begin (d) By January 1, 2024, the commissioner must submit a report on the pilot project to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance. At a minimum, the report must include the following: new text end new text begin (1) a description of the pilot project and the locations that participated in the pilot project; new text end new text begin (2) how many noncompliant drivers' licenses, instruction permits, or identification cards were processed during the pilot project; new text end new text begin (3) any information or feedback from the driver's license agents about the pilot project; new text end new text begin (4) a recommendation on whether the issuance of same-day noncompliant drivers' licenses, instruction permits, or identification cards should be expanded statewide. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective on October 1, 2022, and applies to applications received on or after that date. new text end Repealed Minnesota Rule: S3988-1 7400.5200 SELLING NEW OR USED MOTOR VEHICLE. § Subp. 4. Taxes, fees, and title application. Except as provided in items A to D, the dealer shall complete a title and registration application and shall submit the application along with the excise and registration taxes and all applicable fees to the registrar within ten days of the sale of the vehicle. The dealer must have on file an itemized receipt showing a breakdown of the taxes and fees paid. The receipt must be stamped as paid by a deputy registrar. The receipt must be maintained and made available for the registrar's inspection for three years after the sale of the vehicle. § A. If the purchaser is not a Minnesota customer, the dealer is not required to complete an application or submit the application, taxes, and fees. § B. If the purchaser is eligible to pay a prorated tax and provides a prorate account number to the dealer, the dealer shall complete and file a title application, but the dealer is not required to collect and submit either the excise or registration tax. § C. If the vehicle is currently registered in Minnesota, the dealer is not required to collect and submit the registration tax. § D. If the vehicle must have an emissions inspection before registration, the dealer is not required to collect and submit the registration tax.